Privacy Policy...
Introduction
Credit
How we use your personal data
Providing your personal data to others
International transfers of your personal data
Retaining and deleting personal data
Amendments
Your rights
About cookies
Cookies that we use
Cookies used by our service providers
Managing cookies
Our details
1. Introduction
1.1 We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our website visitors
                  and customers.
1.2 This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with
                        respect to the personal data of our website visitors and customers; in
                        other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of
                        that personal data.
1.3 By using our website and agreeing to this policy, you consent to our
                        use of cookies in accordance with the terms of this policy.
1.4 In this policy, "we", "us" and "our" refer to Diviniti Publishing Ltd.
2. Credit
2.1 This document was created using a template from SEQ Legal (
https://seqlegal.com
).
3. How we use your personal data
3.1 In this Section 3 we have set out:
(a) the general categories of personal data that we may process;
(b) the purposes for which we may process personal data; and
(c) the legal bases of the processing.
3.2 We may process data about your use of our website and services ("
usage data
"). The usage data may include your IP address,
                        geographical location, browser type and version, operating system, referral
                        source, length of visit, page views and website navigation paths, as well
                        as information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your service use.
                        The source of the usage data is Google Analytics and Shopify. This usage
                        data may be processed for the purposes of analysing the use of the website
                        and services. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate
                        interests, namely monitoring and improving our website and services.
3.3 We may process your account data ("
account data
"). The
                        account data may include your name and email address. The source of the
                        account data is you. The account data may be processed for the purposes of
                        operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our
                        website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and
                        communicating with you. The legal basis for this processing is our
                        legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and
                        business.
3.4 We may process your information included in your personal profile on
                        our website ("
profile data
"). The profile data may include
                        your name, address, telephone number, email address, profile pictures,
                        gender, date of birth. The profile data may be processed for the purposes
                        of enabling and monitoring your use of our website and services. The legal
                        basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper
                        administration of our website and business.
3.5 We may process information that you post for publication on our website
                        or through our services ("
publication data
"). The
                        publication data may be processed for the purposes of enabling such
                        publication and administering our website and services. The legal basis for
                        this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper
                        administration of our website and business.
3.6 We may process information contained in any enquiry you submit to us
                        regarding goods and/or services ("
enquiry data
"). The
                        enquiry data may be processed for the purposes of offering, marketing and
                        selling relevant goods and/or services to you. The legal basis for this
                        processing is consent.
3.7 We may process information relating to transactions, including
                        purchases of goods and services, that you enter into with us and/or through
                        our website ("
transaction data
"). The transaction data may
                        include your contact details, your card details and the transaction
                        details. The transaction data may be processed for the purpose of supplying
                        the purchased goods and services and keeping proper records of those
                        transactions. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of a
                        contract between you and us and/or taking steps, at your request, to enter
                        into such a contract and our legitimate interests, namely our interest in
                        the proper administration of our website and business.
3.8 We may process information that you provide to us for the purpose of
                    subscribing to our email notifications and/or newsletters ("
notification data
"). The notification data may be
                        processed for the purposes of sending you the relevant notifications and/or
                        newsletters. The legal basis for this processing is consent.
3.9 We may process information contained in or relating to any
                        communication that you send to us ("
correspondence data
").
                        The correspondence data may include the communication content and metadata
                        associated with the communication. Our website will generate the metadata
                        associated with communications made using the website contact forms. The
                        correspondence data may be processed for the purposes of communicating with
                        you and record-keeping. The legal basis for this processing is our
                        legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and
                        business and communications with users.
3.10 We may process any of your personal data identified in this policy
                        where necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims,
                        whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court
                        procedure. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests,
                        namely the protection and assertion of our legal rights, your legal rights
                        and the legal rights of others.
3.11 We may process any of your personal data identified in this policy
                        where necessary for the purposes of obtaining or maintaining insurance
                        coverage, managing risks, or obtaining professional advice. The legal basis
                        for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper
                        protection of our business against risks.
3.12 In addition to the specific purposes for which we may process your
                        personal data set out in this Section 3, we may also process any of your
                        personal data where such processing is necessary for compliance with a
                        legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital
                        interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
3.13 Please do not supply any other person's personal data to us, unless we
                        prompt you to do so.
4. Providing your personal data to others
4.1 We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of
                        companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and
                        all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes, and
                        on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
4.2 We may disclose your personal data to our insurers and/or professional
                        advisers insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes of obtaining or
                        maintaining insurance coverage, managing risks, obtaining professional
                        advice, or the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether
                        in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
4.3 We may disclose
notification data
to our supplier
                        iContact (https://www.icontact.com) insofar as reasonably necessary for us
                        to manage and organise our mailing list and newsletters. You can find
                        information about iContact's privacy policies and practices at
https://www.icontact.com/legal/privacy
4.4 Financial transactions relating to our website and services are handled
                        by our payment services providers (Stripe, Worldpay, Shopify Pay, Apple
                        Pay, Google Pay, Coinbase and SendOwl). We will share transaction data with
                        our payment services providers only to the extent necessary for the
                        purposes of processing your payments, refunding such payments and dealing
                        with complaints and queries relating to such payments and refunds. You can
                        find information about the payment services providers' privacy policies and
                        practices at:
Apple Pay:
https://support.apple.com/en-gb/HT203027
Shopify:
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy
Stripe:
https://stripe.com/gb/privacy
SendOwl:
https://www.sendowl.com/privacy
Google Pay:
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=privacynotice&ldl=en
WorldPay:
https://www.worldpay.com/uk/privacy-policy
PayPal:
https://www.paypal.com/en/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
Coinbase:
https://www.coinbase.com/legal/privacy?locale=en
4.5 In addition to the specific disclosures of personal data set out in
                        this Section 4, we may disclose your personal data where such disclosure is
                        necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject,
                        or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of
                        another natural person. We may also disclose your personal data where such
                        disclosure is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal
                        claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or
                        out-of-court procedure.
5. International transfers of your personal data
5.1 In this Section 5, we provide information about the circumstances in
                        which your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the
                    European Economic Area (EEA).
5.2 The hosting facilities for our website are situated in the United
                        Kingdom and United States. The European Commission has made an "adequacy
                        decision" with respect to the data protection laws of each of these
                        countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by
                        appropriate safeguards, namely the use of standard data protection clauses
                        adopted or approved by the European Commission, a copy of which you can
                        obtain from
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/data-transfers-outside-eu/model-contracts-transfer-personal-data-third-countries_en
5.3 You acknowledge that personal data that you submit for publication
                        through our website or services may be available, via the internet, around
                        the world. We cannot prevent the use (or misuse) of such personal data by
                        others.
6. Retaining and deleting personal data
6.1 This Section 6 sets out our data retention policies and procedure,
                        which are designed to help ensure that we comply with our legal obligations
                    in relation to the retention and deletion of personal data.
6.2 Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be
                        kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
6.3 We will retain your personal data as follows:
(a) All data will be retained for a minimum period of 5 years and for a
                        maximum period of 10 years following its submission to us.
6.4 In some cases it is not possible for us to specify in advance the
                        periods for which your personal data will be retained. In such cases, we
                        will determine the period of retention based on the following criteria:
(a) the period of retention of data will be determined based on the need to
                        login and use our services or access purchased digital products.
6.5 Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6, we may retain
                        your personal data where such retention is necessary for compliance with a
                        legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital
                        interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
7. Amendments
7.1 We may update this policy from time to time by publishing a new version
                    on our website.
7.2 You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with
                        any changes to this policy.
7.3 We may notify you of changes to this policy by email.
8. Your rights
8.1 In this Section 8, we have summarised the rights that you have under
                        data protection law. Some of the rights are complex, and not all of the
                        details have been included in our summaries. Accordingly, you should read
                        the relevant laws and guidance from the regulatory authorities for a full
                    explanation of these rights.
8.2 Your principal rights under data protection law are:
(a) the right to access;
(b) the right to rectification;
(c) the right to erasure;
(d) the right to restrict processing;
(e) the right to object to processing;
(f) the right to data portability;
(g) the right to complain to a supervisory authority; and
(h) the right to withdraw consent.
8.3 You have the right to confirmation as to whether or not we process your
                        personal data and, where we do, access to the personal data, together with
                        certain additional information. That additional information includes
                        details of the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data
                        concerned and the recipients of the personal data. Providing the rights and
                        freedoms of others are not affected, we will supply to you a copy of your
                        personal data. The first copy will be provided free of charge, but
                        additional copies may be subject to a reasonable fee.
8.4 You have the right to have any inaccurate personal data about you
                        rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have
                        any incomplete personal data about you completed.
8.5 In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your
                        personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the
                        personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which
                        they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent to
                        consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules
                        of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing
                        purposes; and the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However,
                        there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions
                        include where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom
                        of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation; or
                        for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
8.6 In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of
                        your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of
                        the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no
                        longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you
                        require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal
                        claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of
                        that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may
                        continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise
                        process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence
                        of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or
                        legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
8.7 You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on
                        grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that
                        the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for:
                        the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the
                        exercise of any official authority vested in us; or the purposes of the
                        legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an
                        objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can
                        demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override
                        your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the
                        establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
8.8 You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data
                        for direct marketing purposes (including profiling for direct marketing
                        purposes). If you make such an objection, we will cease to process your
                        personal data for this purpose.
8.9 You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data
                        for scientific or historical research purposes or statistical purposes on
                        grounds relating to your particular situation, unless the processing is
                        necessary for the performance of a task carried out for reasons of public
                        interest.
8.10 To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal
                        data is:
(a) consent; or
(b) that the processing is necessary for the performance of a contract to
                        which you are party or in order to take steps at your request prior to
                    entering into a contract,
and such processing is carried out by automated means, you have the right
                        to receive your personal data from us in a structured, commonly used and
                        machine-readable format. However, this right does not apply where it would
                        adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others.
8.11 If you consider that our processing of your personal information
                        infringes data protection laws, you have a legal right to lodge a complaint
                        with a supervisory authority responsible for data protection. You may do so
                        in the EU member state of your habitual residence, your place of work or
                        the place of the alleged infringement.
8.12 To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal
                        information is consent, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any
                        time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the
                        withdrawal.
8.13 You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your personal data
                        by written notice to us.
9. About cookies
9.1 A cookie is a file containing an identifier (a string of letters and
                        numbers) that is sent by a web server to a web browser and is stored by the
                        browser. The identifier is then sent back to the server each time the
                    browser requests a page from the server.
9.2 Cookies may be either "persistent" cookies or "session" cookies: a
                        persistent cookie will be stored by a web browser and will remain valid
                        until its set expiry date, unless deleted by the user before the expiry
                        date; a session cookie, on the other hand, will expire at the end of the
                        user session, when the web browser is closed.
9.3 Cookies do not typically contain any information that personally
                        identifies a user, but personal information that we store about you may be
                        linked to the information stored in and obtained from cookies.
10. Cookies that we use
10.1 We use cookies for the following purposes:
(a) authentication - we use cookies to identify you when you visit our
                        website and as you navigate our website;
(b) status - we use cookies to help us to determine if you are logged into
                        our website;
(c) personalisation - we use cookies to store information about your
                        preferences and to personalise the website for you;
(d) security - we use cookies as an element of the security measures used
                        to protect user accounts, including preventing fraudulent use of login
                        credentials, and to protect our website and services generally;
(e) analysis - we use cookies to help us to analyse the use and performance
                        of our website and services; and
(f) cookie consent - we use cookies to store your preferences in relation
                        to the use of cookies more generally. You can manage your cookie settings for this 
                        website by adjusting your browser settings (instructions on this are set out below in 'Section 12. Managing Cookies').
11. Cookies used by our service providers
11.1 Our service providers use cookies and those cookies may be stored on
                    your computer when you visit our website.
11.2 We use Google Analytics to analyse the use of our website. Google
                        Analytics gathers information about website use by means of cookies. The
                        information gathered relating to our website is used to create reports
                    about the use of our website. Google's privacy policy is available at:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
11.3 On our sister website www.hypnosisaudio.com we use Shopify. This service uses cookies to operate our ecommerce
                        store, take orders and manage your account with us. You can view the
                        privacy policy of this service provider at
                        https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy
11.4 On our sister website www.hypnosisaudio.com we use Sendowl. This service uses cookies to operate our digital
                        download system and secure digital files. You can view the privacy policy
                        of this service provider at
https://www.sendowl.com/privacy
11.5 On our sister website www.hypnosisaudio.com we use Affilatly. This service uses cookies to operate our affiliate
                        tracking system. You can view the privacy policy of this service provider
                        at
https://www.affiliatly.com/terms-of-use-and-privacy-statement.html
11.6 We use iContact. This service uses cookies to operate our mailing list
                        system and send out our newsletters and offers. We can track, at an
                        individual level, whether the user has opened and clicked on an email. We
                        do not use this information at a personal level, rather we use it to
                        understand open and click rates on our emails to try and improve them. If
                        you want to be sure that none of your email activity is tracked then you
                        should opt out of our emails which you can do via the unsubscribe link at
                        the bottom of every email we send. You can view the privacy policy of this
                        service provider at
https://www.icontact.com/legal/privacy
11.7 We use social media buttons on this website. These cookies are set on your machine by
                        external websites whose services are used on this site. Cookies of this
                        type are the sharing buttons across the site allow visitors to share
                        content onto social networks. Cookies are currently set by Twitter, Google
                        & Facebook.
In order to implement these buttons, and connect them to the relevant
                        social networks and external sites they may use scripts from domains
                        outside of our website. You should be aware that these sites are likely to
                        be collecting information about what you are doing all around the internet,
                        including on this website.
You should check the respective policies of each of these sites to see how
                        exactly they use your information and to find out how to opt out, or
                        delete, such information. You can view the privacy policy of these service
                        providers at:
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/full_data_use_policy
Twitter:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Google:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
11.8 We use Facebook Pixel by Meta Platforms (Meta). This allows us to display interest-based advertisements (“Facebook Ads”) to users of the website when they visit the social network “Facebook” or other websites also using this tool. In this way, we pursue the interest in displaying advertisements that are of interest to you in order to make our website or offers more interesting for you. We also use the Facebook Pixel and the Conversions API to ensure that our Facebook Ads match the potential interest of users. With the help of the Facebook Pixel, we can track the effectiveness of Facebook ads for statistical and market research purposes by seeing whether users were redirected to our website after clicking on a Facebook ad (so-called “conversion”). You can read about Facebook's privacy policy here:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy
11.9 We use Wordpress. The Blog and Forum section of this website runs the
                        popular WordPress CMS and cookies are used to store basic data on your
                        interactions, and whether you have logged into WordPress. We use a session
                        cookie to remember your log-in for you if you are a registered user and we
                        deem these as being strictly necessary to the working of the website. If
                        these are disabled then various functionality on the site will be broken.
                        More information on session cookies and what they are used for at
www.allaboutcookies.org/cookies/session-cookies-used-for.html
11.10 If you click a link to our sister website www.hypnosisaudio.com we use
                        cookies to track the items in your basket as you navigate from page to
                        page. We also use these cookies to remember who you are when you log in and
                        register with us. You can view the privacy policy of this service provider
                        at
https://www.hypnosisaudio.com/pages/privacy
12. Managing cookies
12.1 Most browsers allow you to refuse to accept cookies and to delete
                        cookies. The methods for doing so vary from browser to browser, and from
                        version to version. You can however obtain up-to-date information about
                        blocking and deleting cookies via these links:
(a)
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en
(Chrome);
(b)
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website-preferences
(Firefox);
(c)
http://www.opera.com/help/tutorials/security/cookies
(Opera);
(d)
https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
(Internet Explorer);
(e)
https://support.apple.com/en-gb/HT201265
(Safari); and
(f)
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/windows-10-microsoft-edge-and-privacy
(Edge).
12.2 Blocking all cookies will have a negative impact upon the usability of
                        many websites.
12.3 If you block cookies, you will not be able to use all the features on
                        our website.
13. Our details
13.1 This website is owned and operated by Diviniti Publishing.
13.2 We are registered in England and Wales under registration number
3839308
, and our registered office is at:
Diviniti Publishing Ltd,
Unit 1 Bourne Enterprise Centre,
Wrotham Road,
Borough Green,
Kent, TN15
                  8DG.
13.3 Our principal place of business is at the address above.
13.4 You can contact us:
(a) by post, to the postal address given above;
(b) using our website contact form;
(c) by telephone, on +44 (0)1732 882057; or
(d) by email on our
contact page
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.icontact.com/legal/privacy:
Email Marketing Privacy Policy
Effective Jan 23rd, 2025
The email marketing businesses, including Kickbox, Campaigner, SMTP, iContact, and their subsidiaries, affiliates, and parent company, Ziff Davis, Inc. (collectively “
Email Marketing
”) provide enhanced email marketing capabilities and services to enterprise customers.  Email Marketing values your privacy and is committed to protecting the privacy of your information.
This Privacy Policy (or “policy”) describes how Email Marketing uses the personal information you provide and the rights you have. We have created this
Privacy Portal
to help you exercise your rights.
Privacy Policy Overview
Information We Collect, Receive and Create About You
Data Processing and Retention
Sensitive Personal Information
Direct Marketing
Behavioral Advertising
Cookies
Information We Share With Third Parties
International Transfers of Information
Data Security and Breach Handling
How to Control your Information
Your Rights with Respect to Your Personal Information
How to Change Your Preferences
Contact Details
Children
California Consumer Rights Metrics
How this Privacy Policy May Change
1. Privacy Policy Overview
Email Marketing owns and operates several interactive websites, mobile and connected  applications, including their and other online interactive features and services (collectively “services” or “our services”).
This policy covers information collected through the following websites and mobile applications.
Campaigner
iContact
Kickbox
SMTP
And related mobile and desktop sites and applications
In part, the purpose of this policy is to notify users of Email Marketing’s policies and practices with respect to their data. By using the services provided you have agreed to the
Terms and Conditions
(or ToU); and this policy is a part of the ToU.
2. Information We Collect, Receive and Create about You
We may collect or obtain information about you when you sign up, when you create profiles, pages or contributions, when you use and interact with our services and when you make your personal information public. In some cases, we may also receive information about you from third parties.
Data you provide when you sign up:
This is, for example, username, password, name, email, phone, physical address, subscription and billing information, and business information, and basic information about any other accounts you choose to associate with your registration, like your Google account.
Data you provide when you create accounts:
This is user generated contributions, such as web pages and all related content. We encourage all of our users to make conscious choices about what they share online. Email Marketing, including its affiliates, subsidiaries and parent company, is not responsible for the information you disclose to the public using our services.
Data we collect through your use of our services:
We make and keep records when we provide you support or assistance on our services. We may also collect information about how you interact with our various services (or parts of our services) or third party content you see on our apps and sites. We also collect data on how you interact with the ads you see.
Data we receive from third parties:
In some cases, we may receive information about you from third parties, for example, social networking sites. Please note that this policy does not cover the practices of third parties, including those that may disclose information to us.
3. Data Processing and Retention
We process your personal information in order to provide you the best experience of our services. We may also process your Information where the processing is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal rights.
Below is a chart stating which categories of your personal information we process for which purposes specifically, and how long we retain that data. Our processing of your data is subject to your use of our service, your privacy preferences, and your account settings choices.
Personal Information
We may process the following categories of personal iInformation about you.
Categories of personal information
Purpose of processing
legal basis
Retention Period
Account Information (Personal Details):
Information you provide to us such as, your name; postal address; telephone and/or mobile number; email address; employer; login details, including username and password; interests; public social media handles or profile(s); and photograph posted by you and other users.
To provide use of our services as agreed in the ToU.
__________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
App Data.
Data and metrics around account usage.
Maintain and improve service standards
___________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Audio, Video, and Other Electronic Data:
audio, electronic, visual, or similar information such as photographs, video submissions, call recordings and contents of your media library.
Promote user expression through our services and to conduct contests and rewards.
___________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Consent Records:
records of any consents you may have given, together with the date and time, means of consent and any related information (e.g., the subject matter of the consent).
Comply with applicable laws and regulations and users’ choices.
___________
Legal Requirement
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Customer Records:
electronic customer records containing personal information, such as name, signature, address, telephone number, or any financial information. We may also collect Personal Data information about you through your communications with our customer support team.
NOTE: Please ensure that no sensitive personal data is submitted in connection with your requests for support (for example, health information, political or religious beliefs, information about minors, etc.).
To maintain service standards and provide users with the ability to communicate efficiently and effectively with our company.
____________
Legitimate Interest
Customer records will be kept in accordance with applicable laws.
Demographic Information:
We may collect gender; age/date of birth; nationality; salutation; job title, company information, education, work experience and other professional information; language preferences.
Enable customer expression, maintain and improve service standards, and marketing with consent.
____________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Location Information:
We collect your IP address from which we can derive imprecise location information, for example, at the city or zip code level, of a user’s computer or device. We may also have this type of location information if you provide it to us during sign up or in your profile, project page, or contributions.
Maintain service standards, provide relevant content and marketing with consent.
____________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Profile Information and User Contributions:
For certain Services, you may choose to create a public profile, a project page or a profile page, or create your own contributions.All contents of these pages and contributions are processed, including any views and opinions included by you.
Enable customer expression, and provide  use of our services as agreed in the ToU.
____________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Transaction Information:
information on how you interact with the Services, including records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered  such as the coupons you view and redeem, the gift cards you purchase or sell via our Services, the cash back offers that you claim, including copies of receipts that you submit; financial information related to your transactions, information about you as needed to administer your participation in our rewards programs; payment information, including payment card number, expiration date, and CVN; other information about how you use our Services, email, or searches for and interactions with e-commerce opportunities, such as how you interact with our merchants, business partners, and service providers, including, in some cases and where your settings permit, the items you purchase from those merchants.
Completion of transaction, providing full use of our services as agreed in the ToU, and marketing with consent.
_____________
Performance of a Contract
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Device Information and Device ID:
Device ID, which is a distinctive number associated with a smartphone or similar handheld device.  As well as, device information, including Device type, operating system and software information, and settings.
Maintain and improve the quality of services
____________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Advertising Identifiers:
A user-resettable identification number for advertising associated with a device (e.g., iOS uses the Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) and Android uses Google Advertising ID).
Marketing
_________
Consent
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Connectivity Data:
We may collect WiFi connection or service set identifier (“SSID”), mobile or desktop access, and IP verification.
Maintain and improve the quality of services
____________
Legitimate Interest
For the life of the account and a reasonable and legally compliant time thereafter.
Cookies
: Information collected through the use of cookies, eTags, Javascript, pixel tags, device ID tracking, anonymous identifiers and other technologies, including information collected using such methods and technologies about (i) your visits to, and interaction and engagement with, the Services, Subject to your privacy choices and settings, content and ads on third party websites, applications, platforms and other media channels (“
Channels
”), and (ii) your interaction with emails including the content and ads therein (collectively, “
Online Data
”).
Marketing
_________
Consent
In compliance with the Cookie Policy
Engagement Data:
Information about (i) your visits to, and interaction and engagement with the services, content and ads on third party websites, applications, platforms and other media channels (“
Channels
”), and (ii) your interaction with emails including the content and ads therein (collectively, “
Online Data
”), which are collected through the use of cookies and cookie like technologies.
Marketing
____________
Consent
In compliance with the Cookie Policy
4. Sensitive Personal Information
We do not seek to collect or process sensitive personal information, such as, race or ethnicity, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, physical or mental health, or sex life. Where users choose to disclose sensitive personal information, we do not use the sensitive information for any additional purpose without consent, unless required to comply with laws, or prevent crimes.
5. Direct Marketing
We may use the contact details you provided us to reach out to you with information regarding services that may be of interest to you, for example, upcoming promotions. You may unsubscribe or opt out of SMS messages at any time at no cost.
6. Behavioral Advertising
Email Marketing and third parties, subject to your privacy choices and settings, may collect data about your behavior while using our services in order to provide you with more relevant interest-based advertising on other websites and applications, as well as our partners’ platforms and media channels.
7. Cookies
We may collect information about you through the use of cookies and similar technologies on our sites and apps, or your devices. In compliance with your privacy choices and settings, we also may permit our third-party service providers to perform various analytics functions and to provide you with more relevant or interest-based advertisements using cookies.
Some third parties may choose to use their own cookies for the purposes of collecting information relating to the viewing of their advertising. To learn more about how we use cookies, and to manage your preferences, please see our
Cookie Policy
.  This policy, and our Cookie Policy, are only intended to cover the use of cookies as they relate to Email Marketing businesses.
8. Information We Share with Third Parties
Ziff Davis Companies:
Email Marketing is owned by Ziff Davis Inc. We share your information with other businesses owned by Ziff Davis, Inc. (“Ziff Davis Companies”) to assist us in the operation of our services, improve them, and further develop them.
We also share information with other Ziff Davis Companies for the purposes of targeted advertising. If you would like to opt out of the sale or sharing of your data with other Ziff Davis Companies, you can do so via our
Privacy Portal
.
Other Third Parties:
We may also share your personal information with the following:
Relevant third party provider, where our services use third party advertising, plugins or content, subject to your privacy choices and settings, and our ToU;
Merchants, business partners, or advertisers where you consented and chose to participate in offers, contests, or other activities;
Third party Processors (such as analytic providers; data centers; etc.), located anywhere in the world, subject to the requirements and limitations;
Legal and regulatory authorities, upon request, or for the purposes of reporting any actual or suspected breach of applicable law or regulation;
Any party as directed by a law enforcement agency or court, to the extent necessary for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal rights;
Law enforcement for the purposes of prevention, detection, or investigation of criminal offenses and any legal proceedings associated with them; and
In the case of a full or partial acquisition, relevant third parties. A list of sub-processors is available upon request.
9. International Transfers of Information
We may transfer your information to recipients in other countries. Email Marketing participates in the E.U.-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Framework and the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules System. Where we transfer information from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) to a recipient outside the EEA that is not in an adequate jurisdiction, we do so on the basis of standard contractual clauses.
Because of the international nature of our business, we may need to transfer your information within the Ziff Davis Companies, and to third parties as noted above, in connection with the purposes set out in this Policy. For this reason, we may transfer your information to other countries that may have different laws and data protection compliance requirements to those that apply in the country in which you are located. We remain liable under the DPF Principles if any third parties that we transfer your personal information to process it in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
Email Marketing and its associated affiliates and subsidiaries complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Email Marketing has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Email Marketing has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
.
We are committed to staying current with developments related to the Data Privacy Framework and may update our transfer mechanisms and safeguards as necessary to remain compliant. Any updates will be reflected in this Privacy Policy.
If you are a European individual with a privacy related complaint, concern or question about Ziff Davis, Inc.’s privacy practices, please contact us through our
Privacy Portal
. Under certain conditions, more fully described on the Data Privacy Framework website, European individuals may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
Where we transfer your personal information from the EEA to recipients located outside the EEA who are not in a jurisdiction that has been formally designated by the European Commission as providing an adequate level of protection for information, we do so on the basis of standard contractual clauses. You may request a copy of the relevant standard contractual clauses using our
Privacy Portal
. Please note that when you transfer any personal information directly to an entity established outside the EEA, we are not responsible for that transfer of your information. We will nevertheless process your information, from the point at which we receive the data, in accordance with the provisions of this policy.
Enforcement Authority
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over our compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
Complaints Mechanism
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Email Marketing commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information.  EU and UK individuals and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Ziff Davis at
privacy@icontact.com
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Email Marketing commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider.  The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.  For further information please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
.
Under certain conditions, a binding arbitration option may be available to you in order to address complaints not resolved by any other means. For further information, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles at:
www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Email Marketing commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human resources data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in the context of the employment relationship.
For a list of our subsidiaries and affiliates who also adhere to the DPF Principles, please click
here
.
Our privacy practices described in this Policy comply with the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (“APEC”) Cross Border Privacy Rules System. To learn more about this program, please click
here
.
10. Data Security and Breach Handling
We implement appropriate technical and organizational security measures to protect your personal information against unlawful destruction, loss alteration, misuse, or unauthorized access while in our possession. All parties we contract with must agree to provide reasonable data security measures for the customer information we share with them, in compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
If we learn of a security breach that affects our users, we may send an email or other direct communication to you, or post a blog to notify the public on our Help and Support Security Center. If you have any reason to believe that your data with us has been compromised (for example, there has been unauthorized access to your account), please contact us at
privacy@icontact.com
.
11. Data Retention
We will retain your personal information for as long as is necessary in connection with the purposes set out in this policy, and in accordance with applicable laws. For more details on how long data is retained see the table in Section 3.
12. Your Rights With Respect to Your Personal Information
Many privacy regulations afford consumers a number of specific rights. If you are a resident of the EU (under GDPR), UK (under the UK GDPR), Brazil (under the LGPD), several U.S. States, including California (CCPA), Virginia (under VCDPA), Colorado (under the CPA), and Connecticut (under the CTDPA), or another jurisdiction with similar privacy requirements, you have certain rights which may include those listed below.
Your rights:
Right to Withdraw Consent: Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal information by IeL, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
Right to Know:
You have a right to know what personal information we collect, process, and share or sell. This policy is meant to provide transparency with regard to your data. If you have additional questions, you can email us at
privacy@icontact.com
.
Right of Access
: You can request a copy of the personal information we have collected about you from us.
Right to Delete/Erase
: You can request us to delete all the information we have collected about you. It is important to note that by exercising your right to deletion you may lose access to your account and any purchases, points or features associated with it. If you wish to cancel your account or request that we no longer use some or all of your information to provide you services, please contact us via the details provided in Section 14.
Right to Request Rectification
: If you find that any of your information that we are processing is inaccurate, you can contact us to have your information corrected. In response, we will cancel or remove your information but may retain and use copies of your information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements. For certain requests, we may require additional information.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale or Sharing for Targeted Ads (CA):
Under some circumstances we may sell or share the personal data you provide to us to provide ads to you that align with your interests. If you would prefer not to have your data sold or shared, you can opt-out of selling or sharing by submitting a request via
Privacy Portal
or by emailing
privacy@icontact.com
. We may ask for additional information to verify your request.
Right to Object to the Processing
: You can object to our processing of your personal information via our
Privacy Portal
, under certain circumstances. By objecting to processing, you may not be able to access some or all of our services. This right is limited to personal data processed for commercial purposes.
Right to Object to the Use of Sensitive Personal Information
: You have the right to object to our use of your sensitive personal information. Sensitive personal information is information about your health, race, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, political opinions or philosophical beliefs. You should always be mindful about the personal information you share online, especially when it is sensitive in nature.
Right to Object to Automated Processing:
You have a right to object to the processing of your data for the purposes of automated decision making about you.
Right to not be Discriminated Against:
You have a right to not be discriminated against for exercising your rights.
Right to Complain (EU, UK, Switzerland): Should you wish to raise a complaint about the collection or use of your information, you have the right to do so without prejudice to any other rights you may have. You may lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority.
Right to an Authorized Agent (CA): If you would like to make a request on behalf of a California consumer who is a current or former customer, please provide an email from the email address we have on file for the customer authorizing the request. You may also make a request under the California Consumer Privacy Act on behalf of a California consumer if you provide (1) a signed, written permission from the consumer to act on your behalf, and the consumer verifies their own identity directly with us; or (2) proof that the consumer has provided you with power of attorney pursuant to Probate Code sections 4000 to 4465. We may deny a request from an agent that does not submit proof that they have been authorized by the consumer to act on their behalf.
In order to make privacy requests please visit our
Privacy Portal
and fill out the form. You can also email us at
privacy@icontact.com
. Our contact information can be found in the “Contact Details” section below.
You may be required to verify your identity before we can give effect to these rights. If you are making a request on behalf of a user, we require a signed authorization letter from the consumer.
13. How to Change Your Preferences
You can change your preferences at any time. Below is a list of some of the actions you can take.
Your Newsletter and Email Subscriptions
. You can opt out or unsubscribe to a newsletter or other email list at any time by following the instructions at the end of the newsletters or emails you receive. Please allow five to ten business days for changes to take effect. On some Services, member service-related communications are an integral part of the service to which you subscribe and you may continue to receive emails as part of that particular portion of the services, even if you opt out of the newsletters or email list. In these cases, you cancel your account to cease communication. Also note that if you have provided more than one email address to us, you may continue to be contacted unless you request to unsubscribe each email address you have provided, or delete your accounts.
Opting Out of Tracking
. Currently, our Services do not recognize browser do-not-track signals. However, you may manage how your browser handles cookies and related technologies by adjusting its privacy and security settings. Browsers are different, so refer to instructions related to your browser to learn about cookie-related and other privacy and security settings that may be available. The Help portion of the toolbar on most browsers will tell you how to prevent your computer from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether. You can also opt-out of being targeted by certain third party advertising companies.
California Residents
. In accordance with the California Online Privacy Protection Act, we may collect Personal Information about your online activities when you use our services. California’s “Shine the Light” law permits our users who are California residents to request and obtain certain information about any Personal Information disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes. If you are a California resident and wish to make such a request or if you wish for us to refrain from gathering your Personal Information, please submit your request in writing to us using the contact details in Section 14.
14. Contact Details
You can submit privacy related inquiries to our
Privacy Portal
.
For any additional questions, you can contact us by emailing:
iContact:
support@icontact.com
Correspondence:
Ziff Davis
Attention: Legal Department
114 Fifth Avenue, 15th Floor
New York, NY 10011
We have registered our DPO with the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you have any questions or concerns about our privacy practices, we encourage you to contact our DPO at the following email address
dpo@ziffdavis.com
or at the following address:
Ziff Davis
Attention: Legal Department
Unit. 3.1, Woodford Business Park
Santry, Dublin 17
Ireland
15. Children
These services are not intended for use by children, especially those under 18. We reserve the right to remove a user’s account at any time, when necessary, if we discover that a user is under the required age limit for the service. If you have reason to believe we have collected personal information from someone under 18, please report it to us so we can take appropriate steps to rectify this.
16. California Consumer Rights Metrics
Pursuant to the California privacy regulations, our consumer rights metrics can be found on our
Regulatory Information Site
.
17. How this Privacy Policy May Change
This policy may be amended or updated from time to time at our discretion. Any updates will be effective at the time of publication, unless specified otherwise. Your continued use of our services after the publication of a policy update constitutes your consent to the changes. We will notify you prior to making policy updates that materially change the way we treat your personal data, and will not use your data in a materially different manner without your consent.
We Care About Your Privacy
We and our
878
partners store and access personal data, like browsing data or unique identifiers, on your device. Selecting I Accept enables tracking technologies to support the purposes shown under we and our partners process data to provide. Selecting Reject All or withdrawing your consent will disable them. If trackers are disabled, some content and ads you see may not be as relevant to you. You can resurface this menu to change your choices or withdraw consent at any time by clicking the Manage Preferences link on the bottom of the webpage  .Your choices will have effect within our Website. For more details, refer to our Privacy Policy.
Our Privacy Policy
We and our partners process data to provide:
Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
List of Partners (vendors)
More Options
Reject All
I Accept
Sub-policy 1
https://www.shopify.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to Content
Updated March 2, 2023
Privacy Policy
How Shopify handles your data
Table of Contents
Introduction
Our values
Why we process your information
Your rights over your information
Where we send your information
How long do we retain your information
Our use of Machine Learning
How we protect your information
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
How you can reach us
United States Regional Privacy Notice
Introduction
In our mission to make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use information about you, our
merchants using Shopify
to power your business
customers
who shop at a Shopify-powered business
partners
who develop apps for merchants to use, build stores on behalf of merchants, refer potential entrepreneurs to Shopify, or otherwise help merchants operate or improve their Shopify-powered business
users of Shopify apps
and services like
Shop
or
Shop Pay
visitors to
Shopify’s websites
, or anyone contacting
Shopify support
This Privacy Policy will help you better understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information. If we change our privacy practices, we may update this privacy policy. If any changes are significant, we will let you know (for example, through the Shopify admin or by email).
Our values
Trust is the foundation of the Shopify platform and includes trusting us to do the right thing with your information. Three main values guide us as we develop our products and services. These values should help you better understand how we think about your information and privacy.
Your information belongs to you
We carefully analyze what types of information we need to provide our services, and we try to limit the information we collect to only what we really need. Where possible, we delete or anonymize this information when we no longer need it. When building and improving our products, our engineers work closely with our privacy and security teams to build with privacy in mind. In all of this work our guiding principle is that your information belongs to you, and we aim to only use your information to your benefit.
We protect your information from others
If a third party requests your personal information, we will refuse to share it unless you give us permission or we are legally required. When we are legally required to share your personal information, we will tell you in advance, unless we are legally forbidden.
We help merchants and partners meet their privacy obligations
Many of the merchants and partners using Shopify do not have the benefit of a dedicated privacy team, and it is important to us to help them meet their privacy obligations. To do this, we try to build our products and services so they can easily be used in a privacy-friendly way. We also provide detailed FAQs and documentation covering the most important privacy topics, and respond to privacy-related questions we receive.
Why we process your information
We generally process your information when we need to do so to fulfill a contractual obligation (for example, to process your subscription payments to use the Shopify platform), or where we or someone we work with needs to use your personal information for a reason related to their business (for example, to provide you with a service). Laws in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in the United Kingdom (“UK”) call these reasons “legitimate interests.” These “legitimate interests” include:
preventing risk and fraud
answering questions or providing other types of support
helping merchants find and use apps through our app store
providing and improving our products and services
providing reporting and analytics
testing out features or additional services
assisting with marketing, advertising, or other communications
We only process personal information for these “legitimate interests” after considering the potential risks to your privacy and balancing any risks with certain measures—for example, by providing clear transparency into our privacy practices, offering you control over your personal information where appropriate, limiting the information we keep, limiting what we do with your information, who we send your information to, how long we keep your information, or the technical measures we use to protect your information.
We may also process your personal information where you have provided your consent. In particular, where we cannot rely on an alternative legal basis for processing, where you direct us to transfer information to a third party, where we receive your data from a third party is sourced and it already comes with consent or where we are required by law to ask for your consent (including in the context of some of our sales and marketing activities). At any time, you have a right to withdraw your consent by changing your communication choices, opting out from our communications or by contacting us.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, to understand our purposes for processing, categories of recipients and legal basis for processing for each type of personal data.
Your rights over your information
We believe you should be able to access and control your personal information no matter where you live. Depending on how you use Shopify, you may have the right to request access to, correct, amend, delete, port to another service provider, restrict, or object to certain uses of your personal information. We will not charge you more or provide you with a different level of service if you exercise any of these rights. Please note that a number of these rights apply only in certain circumstances, and all of these rights may be limited by law.
If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store and wish to exercise these rights over information about your purchase or interaction, you need to directly contact the merchant you interacted with. We are a processor and process information on their behalf. We will of course help our merchants to fulfill these requests to the extent required by law, such as by giving them the tools to do so and by answering their questions.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with, please submit your data subject request through our
online portal
. Please note that if you send us a request relating to your personal information, we have to make sure that it is you before we can respond. In order to do so, we may use a third party to collect and verify identification documents. Further information about rights available to US residents can be found below under the header “United States Regional Privacy Notice”.
If you are not happy with our response to a request, you can contact us to resolve the issue. If you are located in the EEA or UK, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection or privacy authority at any time.
Finally, because there is no common understanding about what a
“Do Not Track”
signal is supposed to mean, we don’t respond to those signals in any particular way.
Where we send your information
We are a Canadian company, but we work with and process data about individuals across the world. To operate our business, we may send your personal information outside of your state, province, or country, including to the United States. This data may be subject to the laws of the countries where we send it. We take steps to protect your information when we send your information across borders.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant.
Transfers outside of Europe and Switzerland
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, your personal information is controlled by our Irish affiliate, Shopify International Ltd. Your information is then sent to other Shopify locations and to service providers who may be located in other regions, including Canada (where we are based) and the United States. When we send your personal information outside of the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, when we send your personal information to Canada it is protected under Canadian law, which the European Commission has found adequately protects your information. If we then send this personal information outside of Canada (for example, when we send this information to our
Subprocessors
), this information is protected by contractual commitments that are comparable to those provided in the
Standard Contractual Clauses.
Finally, while we do what we can to protect your information, we may at times be legally required to disclose your personal information (for example, if we receive a valid court order). For information about how we respond to such orders, please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
How long do we retain your information
We will retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information or store your information in an aggregated and anonymized format.
Depending on whether you are a merchant, customer, partner, user or visitor, please refer to our supplemental privacy policies, as relevant, for further details on the retention of your personal information.
Our use of Machine Learning
One of the ways in which we are able to help merchants using Shopify is by using techniques like “machine learning” (some laws, including certain EEA and UK laws, may refer to this as “automated decision-making”) to help us improve our services. When we use machine learning, we either: (1) still have a human being involved in the process (and so are not fully automated); or (2) use machine learning in ways that don’t have legal or similarly significant effects (for example, reordering how apps might appear when you visit the app store).
How we protect your information
Our teams work tirelessly to protect your information, and to ensure the security and integrity of our platform. We also have independent auditors assess the security of our data storage and systems that process financial information. However, we all know that no method of transmission over the Internet, and method of electronic storage, can be 100% secure. This means we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your personal information. You can find more information about our security measures at
/ie/security
.
How we use “cookies” and other tracking technologies
We use
cookies
and similar tracking technologies on our website and when providing our services. For more information about how we use these technologies, including a list of other companies that place cookies on our sites, a list of cookies that we place when we power a merchant’s store, and an explanation of how you can opt out of certain types of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about, make a request relating to, or complain about how we process your personal information, please contact
Shopify Support
, or mail us at one of the addresses below. If you would like to submit a legally binding request to demand someone else’s personal information (for example, if you have a subpoena or court order), please review our
Guidelines for Legal Requests
.
If you are a merchant, partner, Shop user, Shopify employee, website visitor or other individual that Shopify has a direct relationship with and you are located in the EEA or UK, Shopify International Ltd is the controller of your personal data. If you buy something from or otherwise provide your information to a Shopify-powered store, the merchant is your data controller and we are acting as a processor on their behalf.
If you have questions about how a merchant or store processes your personal information, you should contact the merchant or visit their privacy policy.
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
If you are located in the EEA, the UK, the Middle East, South America, or Africa:
Shopify International Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Intertrust Ireland
2nd Floor 1-2 Victoria Buildings
Haddington Road
Dublin 4, D04 XN32
Ireland
If you are located in Asia, Australia, or New Zealand:
Shopify Commerce Singapore Pte. Ltd.
Attn: Data Protection Officer
77 Robinson Road,
#13-00 Robinson 77,
Singapore 068896
United States Regional Privacy Notice
This United States Regional Privacy Notice (“US Notice”) supplements our Privacy Policy and all supplemental privacy policies on
www.shopify.com
(together, the “Shopify Privacy Policies”).
This US Notice is for individuals residing in certain US states and is designed to help you better understand how we collect, use, and disclose your personal information and, depending on how you use Shopify and where you reside, how to exercise available rights under various applicable privacy laws in the US, specifically the California Consumer Privacy Act, the Colorado Privacy Act, the Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, the “US Privacy Laws”).
What information we collect and share about you
To provide our apps and services to you, we must process information about you, including personal information.
We do not “sell” your personal information as that term is defined under US Privacy Laws.
Here is a summary of the categories of personal information we may have collected about you over the past 12 months and with whom we may have disclosed that information to, depending on how you use Shopify.
Categories of personal information collected
Recipients of personal information
Identifiers, including name, email address, mailing address, phone number;
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute, including name, mailing and billing address, phone number, credit or debit card information;
Commercial information, including products you purchase, place in your shopping cart, favorite or review (if you are a customer) and information you provide us about you and your business (if you are a merchant);
Photos and videos, which may include face imagery, if you choose to provide them.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including information regarding the device and browser you use, network connection, IP address, and how you browse through our apps and sites;
Geolocation data, including your mailing and billing address;
Inferences, or information derived from other personal information about you, which could include your preferences, interests, and other information used to personalize your experience;
Other information you provide; and
Sensitive personal information, which may include:
Government-issued identifiers, including social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number;
Your account access credentials (such as account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account);
Your device’s precise location (if you are a Shop App user, but only when you allow Shop to access this information);
Information you voluntarily disclose that may reveal certain characteristics about you such as your racial or ethnic origin or sexual orientation
The contents of email messages in the email inboxes that you connect to your Shop account, and information from email messages you transfer to the app to be included in your order history (if you use Shop).
Companies who help us provide you with our services, including cloud storage providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, security vendors, email providers, marketplaces and data analytics vendors;
Advertisers and marketing vendors;
Merchants whose shops you visit or make purchases from;
Partners who provide a range of services to merchants, such as by developing apps or themes for use by merchants, serving as an affiliate that refers potential merchants to us, or helping merchants build or manage stores;
Law enforcement or other third parties in connection with legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Why we collect and share your Personal Information
We use and share your personal information for the purposes set out in the Shopify Privacy Policies. For categories of sensitive personal information that we collect, we only use or disclose such information either with your specific consent when required, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Sources of Personal Information
To make commerce better for everyone at Shopify, we collect and use personal information provided by:
You: We collect the information you provide when you use our platform, including when you sign up for Shopify as a merchant, visit a Shopify-powered store, fill in order information, visit one of Shopify’s websites or contact Shopify support. We collect account and payment information you provide to us (including information about your business if you are a merchant), Shopify stores or items you save to favorites, purchases you make, reviews you post, and how you otherwise interact or communicate with stores or other users on our apps or services. We also collect information about how you browse through our apps and sites, including search terms you may enter.
Your device(s): We collect information from and about the devices you use, including computers, phones, and other web-connected devices you use to access our apps or services, and we combine this information across different devices you use.
Third parties: We receive information from partners who help us provide you with our services including the following:
Email providers. If you use the Shop App and you connect your third party inboxes, such as Gmail or Outlook (according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law), we receive information to identify shopping-related emails and display within Shop information about specific orders you have made, stores you have engaged with in the past, and other related information.
Service Providers. We receive information from our service providers, who help us provide services to our merchants, like reviewing accounts for fraud or other concerns.
Marketplaces. If you use the Shop App, we receive information about purchases you have made from other marketplaces or platforms, such as Amazon, that you choose to connect through Shop. This information helps us to provide and improve Shop, to personalize your experience using our apps and services, and to determine if you are eligible for specific offers or payment methods.
Subprocessors. We work with third party subprocessors for cloud hosting, content delivery, data analysis, internal logging, fulfillment services and email transmission, among others, to provide you with our services. For more information, see Shopify’s subprocessors.
Analytics and cookie providers. We receive information through our use of cookies, social plugins (such as the Facebook “like” button), pixels and tags for business purposes, such as providing information to help measure how users interact with our website content. For more information about how we use these technologies, see our Cookie Policy.
How long we keep your information
Because we need your personal information to provide Shopify services, we generally keep your personal information, including sensitive personal information, while you use Shopify products or services or until you tell us to delete your information. We may also keep personal information to comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests.
If you are a merchant operating a Shopify-powered store, and you close the store, stop paying your subscription fees, or we terminate your account, we retain store information for two years before we begin the deletion process.
When you visit or make a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, we act as a service provider or processor for the merchant, and the merchant, not Shopify, decides how long your information is retained.
Your rights over your information
Depending on where you live, how you use Shopify, and subject to certain exceptions, you may have some or all of the following rights:
Right to Know: The right to request that we disclose to you the personal information we collect, use, or disclose about you, and information about our data practices.
Right to Request Correction: The right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
Right to Request Deletion: The right to request that we delete personal information that we have collected about you.
To exercise your rights, including the “right to know” and “right to delete,” please submit a request through our online portal. If you use Shop or Shop Pay, please visit
https://shop.app/delete-account
for instructions on how to request deletion of your information.
If you have visited or made a purchase from a merchant’s Shopify-powered store, please contact the specific merchant directly. If you make a request to us, we will forward your request to the relevant merchant.
Please note that to protect your information and the integrity of our products and services, we may need to verify your identity before processing your request. In some cases we may need to collect additional information to verify your identity, such as your email address or a government issued ID.
Under US Privacy Laws, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf. If you use an authorized agent to submit a request, we may need to collect additional information, such as a government issued ID, to verify your identity before processing your request to protect your information.
For information on the CCPA requests we have received, please see here. In certain states, you may have the right to appeal our decision regarding a request related to these rights. If you wish to appeal a decision, please contact Shopify Support.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
How you can reach us
If you would like to ask about or have concerns about how we process your personal information, please contact Shopify Support. If you want to make a request relating to your personal information, please contact us using the methods set out in the section immediately above.
Sub-policy 2
https://stripe.com/gb/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Learn more
.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.sendowl.com/privacy:
Privacy Policy
Last updated: June 17, 2024
At SendOwl, we respect your privacy. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, and share the personal information that we gather on the subdomains and websites on sendowl.com (the “Sites”) or through your use of our products and services. We encourage you to read this Privacy Policy before submitting any personal data to us through our Sites. By continuing to use our Sites, you agree to the terms of this Privacy Policy.
Concept Den Ltd. doing business as SendOwl will be the data controller of your personal data if you are a merchant using SendOwl to deliver products (“Merchant”) or a promoter of a Merchant’s product (“Affiliate”). Conversely, SendOwl will be the data processor if you are a customer to a SendOwl Merchant (“End Customer”). This Privacy Policy does not apply to the way we process Merchants’ End Customer information in our role as a service provider to our Merchants. Our Data Processing Addendum, which describes how we process and safeguard Merchants’ End Customer information as a service provider to our Merchants, is available upon request by emailing
dpa-requests@sendowl.com
.
If you are an End Customer to one of our Merchants, please contact your Merchant directly for information regarding how your Merchant uses and shares your personal information gathered from our services.
Please click the following links to learn more about our Privacy Policy:
Information We Collect
How We Use Information
How We Share Information
How Do We Respond to ‘Do Not Track’ Signals?
Cookies
Your Rights
Legal Bases for Processing
Retention and Withdrawal
Data Transfer
Children‘s Privacy
Change of Control
Data Security
Updates
Contact Us
Information We Collect
Information We Automatically Collect
. For all visitors to our site, we collect aggregated information on pages viewed including IP address, timestamps, logins. This information may be collected via several technologies, including cookies, web beacons, clear GIFs, canvas fingerprinting and other means. You can control cookies in your browser to enable or disable them. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Information You or Your Merchant Gives Us
. For our Merchants, we collect registration information including name, email address, telephone number; billing information including address; and information required to sell goods.
For End Customers who buy a digital product from a Merchant that is delivered by SendOwl, we collect information relating to any transactions recorded by us or returned by the payment gateway including name, email address, billing and shipping address.
We use payment processors for payment, analytics, and other business services. Payment processors collect identifying information about the devices that connect to its services. Payment processors use this information to operate and improve the services they provide to us, including for fraud detection. You can learn more about Stripe, our main payment processor, and read its privacy policy at
www.stripe.com/privacy
.
Information We Collect From Third Parties
. If you access our Sites through third parties (e.g., Facebook or Google), or if you share content from our Sites to a third party social media service, the third party service will send us certain information about you if the third party service and your account settings allow such sharing. The information we receive will depend on the policies and your account settings with the third party service.
How We Use Information
The data recorded is used for the following purposes:
to respond to your enquiry, ask a question, contact you about your request or other reasons related to offering and improving our services;
provide checkout capabilities on our site;
to enable us to communicate with you and sellers;
send you our monthly newsletter if you have signed up;
To analyze Sites usage and improve the services offered;
For market research, project planning, troubleshooting problems;
To share your website visitor activity, through website cookies, with third-party marketing partners to market our services on our Sites and other websites that you may visit;
for buyers who buy something that is delivered by SendOwl we collect data so we can provide them with access to their purchase;
to protect against, identify and help prevent fraud, unauthorized activity, claims and other liabilities; and
to fulfil our legal and financial obligations.
How We Share Information
We use third party vendors and hosting partners to provide the necessary equipment required to run the service and may share data with them accordingly in order to provide the services you have requested. Specifically: Cloudflare, Amazon Web Service, Rackspace, MailGun, Google Analytics, FreeAgent, HelpScout, Stripe and MailChimp. We have contracts in place with our third-party vendors that require them to use personal data only as necessary to perform services on our behalf and to implement appropriate security measures as required by law.
We may be required to disclose your data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet law enforcement requirements. We may be under a duty to disclose or share your personal information in order to comply with any legal obligation, to enforce or apply our terms and conditions and other agreements, to protect our rights, property, or safety, or the protect the rights, property, or safety of others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection.
How Do We Respond to ‘Do Not Track’ Signals?
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. We do not recognize or respond to browser-initiated DNT signals, as the Internet industry is currently still working toward defining exactly what DNT means, what it means to comply with DNT, and a common approach to responding to DNT.
Cookies
A cookie is a text file that websites send to a visitor’s computer to uniquely identify the visitor’s browser or to store information or settings in the browser. Cookies may use your IP address, timestamps, logins. Information collected from cookies is used by us to evaluate the effectiveness of our website, analyse trends, and administer our website. This allows us to determine such things as which parts of our website are most visited and difficulties our visitors may experience in accessing our website. To learn more, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
When you visit or log in to our website, cookies and similar technologies may be used by our online data partners or vendors to associate these activities with other personal information they or others have about you, including by association with your email or home address. We (or service providers on our behalf) may then send communications and marketing to these email or home addresses. You may opt out of receiving this advertising by visiting
https://app.retention.com/optout
.
Google Analytics.
We may use Google Analytics. We use the information we get from Google Analytics only to improve this site. We do not combine the information collected through the use of Google Analytics with personally identifiable information. Please refer to Google’s
Privacy Policy
for more information. You may also choose to download the
Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on
.
You may wish to restrict the use of cookies. Please be aware that some of the features of our website may not function correctly if you disable cookies. Most modern browsers allow you to change your cookie settings. You can usually find these settings in the options or preferences menu of your browser. To understand these settings, the following links for commonly used browsers may be helpful:
Cookie settings in Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Microsoft Edge
Cookie settings in Safari web
and
iOS
Personalized Advertising
. We may also use targeted advertising cookies, such as Google Ads, to deliver tailored advertising on our Sites and other websites that you may visit. You can learn more about how to control advertising cookies by visiting the Network Advertising Initiative’s Consumer Opt-Out
link
, the DAA’s Consumer Opt-Out
link
for browsers, or the DAA’s opt-out
link
for mobile devices. Please note that electing to opt-out will not stop advertising from appearing in your browser or applications and may make the ads you see less relevant to your
Your Privacy Rights
If you would like to unsubscribe from receiving our newsletter, you can click on the “unsubscribe” link included in our email or contact us as indicated below.
Exercising Your Privacy Rights
. We have listed the privacy rights for several jurisdictions below, but we understand you may have additional rights in your jurisdiction. You may contact us directly at any time about exercising your data protection rights. We will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
EEA or UK Individuals’ Rights
If you are from the European Economic Area or United Kingdom, you have the right, under certain circumstances, to:
Request access to your personal data.
Request correction of your personal data.
Request erasure of your personal data.
Object to the processing of your personal data for reasons relating to your particular situation.
Request restriction of processing your personal data.
Request to export the personal data that we process based on our contract with you or your consent and transfer it to another company (if technically feasible).
Withdraw any consent you have previously provided to us.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please contact us using the details in the
Contact Us
section.
If you are not happy with our response, you can contact the ICO in the UK, or other data protection regulator in your country. Important note: if you are a customer who has been delivered a product via SendOwl you will need to contact the Merchant regarding your data rights. SendOwl acts as a data processor and it is the Merchant who must complete your data subject requests as your purchase contract is with them, not us.
Additional Disclosures for Certain U.S. State Residents
Certain state laws require that we detail the categories of personal information that we disclose for certain “business purposes,” such as to service providers that assist us with securing our services or marketing our products.
We disclose the following categories of personal information for our business purposes:
Identifiers;
Personal information under
California Civil Code section 1798.80
;
Commercial information;
Internet activity information; and
Inferences drawn from any of the above information categories.
Several jurisdictions grant state residents certain rights, including the right to access specific types of personal information, the right to correct inaccurate personal information, the right to learn how we process personal information, the right to know whether and how we disclose or sell personal information, the right to opt out of any sale of personal information, the right to request deletion of personal information in certain circumstances, the right to limit our use of your sensitive personal information, and the right not to be denied goods or services for exercising these rights.
To make such a request, please contact us using the contact details listed in the
Contact Us
section below.
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
. Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the sale of the consumer’s personal information.
We do not sell your email address, shopping cart data, or other marketing information to third parties. However, under some U.S state laws, some sharing of personal information necessary to provide you with personalized ads may be considered a “sale,” even if no money is exchanged, such as our use of cookies and similar technologies. You may learn more about how to opt out of such personalized ads through our
Cookie Policy
.
Limit the Use of My Sensitive Personal Information
. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose other than providing our goods and services to you, or as otherwise permitted under applicable law.
Third Party Marketing
. California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits you to request information regarding the disclosure of your personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes. We do not disclose your personal information to third parties for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes.
Automated Processing & Profiling.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the processing of personal information for purposes of profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer.
Verification Process for Exercising Rights.
To protect your privacy, we verify privacy rights requests to ensure that only you (or your authorized agent) can exercise rights pertaining to your personal information. As part of our verification process, we may request you submit additional information. If you are an authorized agent wishing to exercise rights on behalf of a state resident, please contact us using the information at the bottom of this privacy policy and provide us with a copy of the consumer's written authorization designating you as their agent. We may need to verify your identity and place of residence before completing your rights request.
Appeal Process.
If we do not decide to act in response to your request to exercise a right, we will provide a timely response detailing the reasons for not taking the action and, depending on your jurisdiction, any rights that you may have to appeal our decision. This may include, where required by law, instructions on how to contact your local Attorney General or Department of Justice for further review.
After confirming that the SendOwl website recognizes and respects
Global Privacy Control
's opt-out signals, add the following to the "How Do We Respond to 'Do Not Track' Signals?" section:
California and certain other U.S. state residents may opt out of tracking technologies by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (GPC) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). To download and use a browser supporting the GPC browser signal, click here:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/orgs
. If you choose to use the GPC signal, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Your request to opt-out of sale/sharing will be linked to your browser identifier only and not linked to any account information because the connection between your browser and the account is not known to us.
Legal Bases for Processing
Billing information is recorded as it is necessary to comply with our contractual obligations when providing our service to Merchants and our Merchants’ End Customers.
We process information about our visitors for the legitimate business interests of developing our site to ensure a better experience for our visitors. We also obtain registration information based on the legitimate interest of business administration. When processing your personal data for our legitimate interests, we take appropriate measures to ensure that the interests we pursue are balanced with your interests, rights and freedoms.
With your consent, we may use your personal data to send you marketing materials, except as otherwise permitted by applicable law. You may also provide consent where we do not rely on another legal basis. Consent may be withdrawn at any time.
We may process data in compliance with a mandatory legal obligation. For example, accounting and tax requirements, which are subject to mandatory retention periods. We may also collect your personal data to record your requests to exercise your rights and to verify your identity for such requests.
In some limited cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet law enforcement requirements, as described above in
How We Share Information
.
Retention and Withdrawal
We retain information from or about you for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy. When the information is no longer necessary for these purposes, we delete it or keep it in a form that does not identify you, unless we are required by law to keep this information for a longer period. When determining the retention period, we take into account various criteria, such as the type of products and services requested by or provided to you, the nature and length of our relationship with you, possible re-enrolment with our products or services, the impact on the services we provide to you if we delete some information from or about you, mandatory retention periods provided by law and the statute of limitations.
Data Transfer
We may transfer your personal data to recipients in countries other than the country in which the personal data originally was collected. Those countries may not offer the same level of protection to your personal data. When we transfer your personal data to recipients outside of the European Economic Area (“EEA”), we will comply with applicable legal requirements by providing adequate protection for the transfer of personal data, including by (i) entering into the European Commission’s EU Standard Contractual Clauses with the data recipients, (ii) verifying that the recipient has implemented Binding Corporate Rules, or (iii) any other appropriate safeguards as required by applicable law for any personal information transferred internationally.
To obtain a copy of our Data Protection Addendum with Standard Contractual Clauses incorporated, please email
dpa-requests@sendowl.com
.
Children’s Privacy
The Sites are not directed at individuals under the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16. If you become aware that a child has provided us with personal information, please contact us using the contact details provided in the
Contact Us
section below. If we become aware that a child under 16 has provided us with personal information, we will take steps to delete such information.
Change of Control
Personal information may be transferred to a third party as a result of a sale, acquisition, merger, reorganization or other change in control. If we sell, merge or transfer any part of the business, part of the sale may include your personal information.
Data Security
We implement a variety of security measures to maintain the safety of your personal information when you enter, submit, or access your personal information. However, no website, application, or transmission can guarantee security. Thus, while we have established and maintain what we believe to be reasonable procedures to protect the confidentiality, security, and integrity of personal information obtained through the Sites, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to us.
Updates
This policy may be periodically updated. We encourage you to periodically review this Privacy Policy to ensure you are familiar with the most current version. Please review carefully before submitting personal data to our site. The date the policy was last updated is indicated at the top of this page.
Contact Us
You can contact us at
support@sendowl.com
if you have any questions regarding this privacy policy.
Sub-policy 4
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=privacynotice&ldl=en:
Google Payments Privacy Notice
Last modified: 4 March 2025
The
Google Privacy Policy
describes how we treat personal information when you use Google products and services. If you are under the age of 18, you can find additional resources in the
Google Teen Privacy Guide
and the
Google Payments privacy guide for children
.
Google Payments is offered to Google Account holders, and your use of it is subject to the Google Privacy Policy. In addition, this Privacy Notice describes Google privacy practices that are specific to Google Payments.
Your use of Google Payments is governed by the Google Payments Terms of Service, which describes in more detail the services covered by this Privacy Notice. Capitalized terms not defined in this Privacy Notice shall have the meaning ascribed to them in the Google Payments Terms of Service.
The Google Payments Privacy Notice applies to services offered by Google LLC or its wholly owned subsidiaries, including Google Payment Corp. ('GPC'). Consult the Google Payments Terms of Service made available to you within the service to learn which subsidiary is offering the service.
For users based in Brazil, the data controller responsible for your information is Google LLC and, to the extent required under Brazilian law, it may be Google Brasil Pagamentos Ltda
For users (except those selling on a Google marketplace) based in the European Economic Area (excluding the UK), the data controller responsible for your information is Google Ireland Limited
For users based in the European Economic Area, excluding the UK, and selling on a Google marketplace, the data controller responsible for your information is Google Payment Ireland Limited
For users (except those selling on a Google marketplace) based in the UK, the data controller responsible for your information is Google LLC
For users based in the UK and selling on a Google marketplace, the data controller responsible for your information is Google Payment Limited
Information we collect
In addition to the information listed in the
Google Privacy Policy
, we may also collect the following:
Registration information
When you sign up for Google Payments, you are creating a Google payments profile that is associated with your Google Account. Depending on the Google Payments services you use, in addition to the information listed in the Google Privacy Policy, you may be asked to provide information, such as:
Credit or debit card number and card expiry date
Bank account number and expiry date
Address
Phone number
Date of birth
National insurance number or taxpayer identification number (or other government-issued identification numbers)
For sellers or businesses specifically, your business category and certain information about your sales or transaction volume
In some cases, we may also ask you to send us additional information or to answer additional questions to help verify your information or identity. Finally, if you register a carrier or operator billing account, we will ask you to provide us with certain information about your carrier or operator account.
Your registration information is stored in association with your Google Account, and your registration of a payment method will be stored on Google's servers. Certain types of data may also be stored on your mobile device.
Information obtained from third parties
We may obtain information about you from third parties, including third-party verification services. This includes:
Information arising from Google Payments transactions at merchant locations
Information regarding your use of payment methods and your accounts issued by third parties that are linked to Google Payments
The identity of your card issuer or financial institution
Feature and benefit information related to your payment method
Information regarding access to balances held in your Google payments profile
Information from a carrier or operator in connection with carrier or operator billing
Consumer reports, as the term 'consumer reports' is defined by the US Fair Credit Reporting Act
Information about your transactions with third parties (like merchants and payment service providers), which will be used for fraud risk modeling and to provide fraud risk scores and other fraud prevention services to third parties
Also, for sellers, we may obtain information about you and your business from a credit bureau or a business information service.
Transaction information
When you use Google Payments to conduct a transaction, we may collect information about the transaction, including:
The date, time and amount of the transaction
The merchant's location and description
A description provided by the seller of the goods or services purchased
Any photo that you choose to associate with the transaction
The names and email addresses of the seller and buyer (or sender and recipient)
The type of payment method used
Your description of the reason for the transaction and the offer associated with the transaction, if any
How we use the information we collect
In addition to the uses listed in the
Google Privacy Policy
, we use the information you provide to us, Google Payment Corp. (GPC), or another of our subsidiaries, as well as information about you from third parties, in order to:
Provide you with Google Payments for customer service purposes
Prevent harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users or the public, including to help prevent fraud, phishing or other misconduct
Assist third parties in the provision of products or services that you request from them
Review your Google payments profile to determine whether you continue to meet the terms of the service
Make decisions about your future Google Payments transactions
Build and train fraud risk models with your historic and current information, and produce fraud risk scores and assessments that are shared with third parties solely for their fraud or abuse prevention purposes
Provide you with information about your payment method’s features and benefits to help you better identify your payment method when using Google Payments
Fulfill other legitimate business needs related to the Google Payments transactions initiated by you
We may retain the information that you provide for the duration of your use of Google Payments, and for an additional period as necessary to comply with our legal and regulatory obligations.
Information we share
We will only share your personal information with other companies or individuals outside of Google in the following circumstances:
As permitted under the
Google Privacy Policy
As permitted by law
As necessary to process your transaction and maintain your account, including to provide security improvements, protect your account against fraud, and for other everyday business purposes
To complete your requested registration for a service provided by a third party
To inform a third-party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google payments profile that can be used to make payments through that merchant's site or app. You can choose to turn off this setting
To share fraud risk scores and other fraud assessments with third parties that use Google’s risk score and fraud prevention services, in order to protect your transactions with third parties from fraud and abuse
To help ensure your payment method is secure and valid, and to provide you with relevant information about your payment method's features and benefits, we may share your personal information with your payment method issuer, payment network, processors, and their affiliates
Examples of when information may be shared:
When you make a purchase or transaction using Google Payments, we make certain personal information about you available to the company or individual that you purchase from or transact with. This includes sharing your personal information with the developer from whom you purchase when you use Google Payments to make a purchase on Google Play
When you make a purchase through a website or app with Google Pay, we might share your ZIP code or postcode and information about your payment method so that the merchant can calculate tax, shipping, and other details related to the cost of your order (such as delivery costs and other price information), and identify whether the merchant can accept that form of payment from you as well as benefits or restrictions for particular forms of payment for your purchase
When you add a third-party payment method to your Google payments profile, we may exchange certain personal information with the third-party payment provider so we can both provide the service to you. The information may include your name, profile image, email, Internet protocol (IP) address, billing address, phone number, device information, location, and Google Account activity information
When you visit a participating merchant site or app, the merchant can check whether you have a Google payments profile with an eligible payment method that can be used to make a purchase through the merchant's site or app, in order to reduce the likelihood that you will see unusable features on sites or apps
When you transact with a third party (like merchants and payment service providers), we may send fraud risk scores and other fraud assessments related to your payment transaction to these third parties, solely for their own fraud or abuse prevention purposes
The information we collect, including information obtained from third parties, may be shared with our affiliates, meaning other companies owned and controlled by Google LLC. Our affiliates, which can be financial and non-financial entities, will use such information for purposes as disclosed in this Privacy Notice and the Google Privacy Policy, including for their everyday business purposes.
We provide you with the right to opt out of certain sharing between GPC and its affiliates, if applicable. Specifically, you may choose to opt out of:
Sharing between GPC and its affiliates of information about your creditworthiness for their everyday business purposes; and/or
Our affiliates marketing their products or services to you based on your personal information that we collect and share with them. This information includes your account history with us
You may also choose to opt out of Google LLC or its affiliates informing a third-party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google payments profile that can be used for payment through that merchant's site or app.
If you choose to opt out, your choice will be effective until you tell us to change your choice.
If you do not want us to share personal information about your creditworthiness between GPC and its affiliates, or if you do not want our affiliates to use your personal information collected by us and shared with them to market to you, or if you do not want Google LLC or its affiliates to inform a third-party merchant, whose site or app you visit, whether you have a Google payments profile, please indicate your preference by logging in to your account, and going to your
Google Payments privacy settings
to update your privacy preferences.
We will not share your personal information with anyone outside of GPC or with our affiliates except as described in this Privacy Notice or the Google Privacy Policy. Google Payments is a product offered to Google Account holders. Data that you provide to Google LLC for the purpose of signing up for a Google Account is not affected by the opt-out provisions in this Privacy Notice.
Keeping your information secure
For more information about our security practices, please see the main
Google Privacy Policy
.
The security of your Google payments profile depends on you keeping your account password(s), PINs, and other access information for the Service confidential:
If you share your Google Account information with a third party, they will have access to your Google payments profile and your personal information
It is your responsibility to control access to your mobile device and the Google Payments application on your device, including keeping your password(s) and/or PIN confidential and not sharing it with anyone
It is also your responsibility to alert Google or the relevant partner if you believe that the security of the information in the Google Payments application has been compromised
Any information that you provide directly to a third-party merchant, website or application is not covered by this Privacy Notice. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of merchants or other third parties with whom you choose to share your personal information directly. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any third party with whom you choose to share your personal information directly.
© 2025 Google –
Google Home
Google Terms of Service
Previous Privacy Notices
Sub-policy 5
https://www.worldpay.com/uk/privacy-policy:
English (US)
Careers
Sign In
Products
Take
Make
Manage
Do more
Online
Accept payments online
In store
Accept payments in person
Omnichannel
Accept payments across channels
Embedded
Embedded payments for software platforms
Payouts
Disburse funds all over the world
Optimize
Enhance your payments and authorization rates
Protect
Safeguard your payments
Understand
Analyze your payments data to improve performance
Loyalty and gift
Additional offerings for your customers
Embedded Finance
Embedded Finance technology for software companies
Who we serve
By business type
By industry
By partner type
Small business
Helping SMBs thrive and grow
Enterprise
Delivering on a massive scale to big businesses
Software platforms
Embedded solutions for software companies
Marketplaces
Where sellers get paid and make payouts
Crypto
Digital content and subscriptions
Field services for software platforms
Financial services
Gaming
Practice management for software platforms
Public sector
Restaurants
Retail
Software platforms
Travel and airlines
Financial institutions
Empower your bank customers with cutting-edge payment solutions
Independent sales organizations
Growing ISO revenue through innovative solutions and dedicated service
Software platforms
Embedded solutions for software companies
Customer stories
Read how our customers have solved their most pressing problems with Worldpay products
Insights
Insights
Articles
Read our insights about payments-related topics
Guides
Learn from our industry expertise
Customer stories
Discover how Worldpay helps all types of businesses
Resources
For customers
For developers
Support
Get the help you need
Account login
Find your login link
Developer Hub
Startup, SMB, software company, or large enterprise – we’ve got you covered with developer resources.
About
Company
About us
Details about Worldpay as a company
Executive team
See who is shaping Worldpay strategically
Careers
As a Worldpayer, you own your career
Newsroom
Get up to date on recent Worldpay news
Legal
Your hub for all of our legal documentation
Contact us
404 - Page Not Found
The page you were looking for could not be found.
Back to Home
Sub-policy 6
https://www.paypal.com/en/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
PayPal Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
10. Your Data Protection Rights
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
16. Users in the UK
17. Definitions
18. Our Contact Information
Status disclosure
Download Printable PDF
PayPal Privacy Statement
Last updated on 1 February 2025
Please contact us if you have any questions regarding this Privacy Statement or in general questions regarding your Personal Data. Your information will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
1. Overview
PayPal UK Ltd (“we,” “our,” “us,” “PayPal”) provides this Privacy Statement to describe our use of your Personal Data when you use your PayPal account, Xoom account, visit our websites, apply for, or use our services (collectively, the “
Services
”). This Privacy Statement does not apply to Other Services, such as Hyperwallet. We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement and to use it to help you make informed decisions.
Certain capitalized terms that are not otherwise defined in the Statement are explained in the “
Definitions
” section below.
2. PayPal’s role as a data controller
In the United Kingdom (UK),
PayPal UK Ltd
is the data controller for the Personal Data collected and processed in connection with Personal Data obtained when you visit our website, during the registration and application process, and throughout your continued use of the services.
Some of the third-parties that we share Personal Data with are independent data controllers. This means that we are not the ones that dictate how the data that we share will be processed. Examples are authorities, credit bureaus, acquirers, and other financial institutions. When your data is shared with independent data controllers, their data policies will apply. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
For more information about how we protect your Personal Data when transferred outside of the UK, please see Section 8, (“
International Transfers of Personal Data
”).
For most of our Services, we act as a “data controller”, however there are some products and features where PayPal may also act as a “data processor” when providing services to our Partners and Merchants.  The “data controller” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that has the control over the purposes and means by which the data processing is performed.  The “data processor” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that processes the Personal Information for the data controller, for the data controller’s specific purposes, and as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection laws.
3. Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Our Services may be accessed by individuals without a PayPal or Xoom account. We will collect Personal Data from you even if you are a non-account holder when you use our Services, such as when you use our Pay Without a PayPal account, use Unbranded Payment Services (e.g. Braintree), use PayPal Groups, use a Fastlane profile, or when you receive a payment through our Services from account holders (“Recipient”). If you use Pay Without a PayPal account, we may link your transaction information with your PayPal account, if you have one at the time you use the Service without logging in, or if you create a PayPal account later. We use the term “User” to apply to account and non-account holders. If you are a non-account holder, your Personal Data will be used to provide the Services and in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal
User Agreement
.
With a Fastlane profile, individuals can store their payment methods and other Personal Data with PayPal so that they can complete the checkout process faster, create a store or loyalty account, or facilitate other transactions at participating Partners and Merchants with payment card, contact information, shipping data or other data they save in their Fastlane profile as relevant to the specific interaction, participating Partner or Merchant, all without having to manually input payment method details and other Personal Data each time they check out (“Fastlane”).
When you create a Fastlane profile, PayPal will store your Personal Data, including your name, email, phone number, address information,  billing information and payment method details, and other data that will be relevant to specific Partner or Merchant interactions, and pre-populate that information in the checkout flows or other interactive features of participating Partners and Merchants so that you can enjoy a faster Partner and Merchant experience by not having to manually input your payment or other information. We will also collect transaction and other Partner or Merchant data related to your purchases and other Partner and Merchant interactions when you use Fastlane. If you have a Fastlane profile, we may recognize you as a Fastlane user when you shop on the participating Partners and Merchants sites and we may prompt you to engage in participating Partner or Merchant interactions, such as register for a store or loyalty account  using your Fastlane profile information. If you choose to interact with participating Partners or Merchants through Fastlane, you agree to let PayPal disclose your Fastlane profile information to the Participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and to facilitate your transaction and shopping experience on the participating Partners and Merchants sites.
When you shop on Partner and Merchant sites, the Partner and Merchant may disclose Personal Data with PayPal that we will use in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal user agreement.
4. Categories of Personal Data We Collect about You
We collect the following categories of information about you to provide our Services, continually improve your user experience, manage and improve our business. The types of Personal Data we collect about you are described below.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from you
,
including from your interactions with us and use of the Services:
Registration and Contact Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect your name, mailing address, email, income, telephone number, tax ID, Payment Information, profession, employment or business information, and other information necessary to establish an account or profile and use our Services.
Identification and Signature Information
. Depending on the Services you choose, we will collect information to verify your name, address, email, phone number, government- issued identification, age and biometric data as well as to create and issue your electronic signature.
Payment Information
. Information such as amount you send or request, your payment instrument, card, or financial or funding account used in connection with the Services, including issuer name, card type, country code, payment account number, CVV, username, and IBAN information.
Information about your imported contacts
. If you choose to import your contact lists, we will collect Information you enter or import about your contacts, such as name, address, phone number, images, email address or usernames associated with the contacts you import or enter manually.
Information in your PayPal Account Profile.
Information you choose to enter such as your username, email, mobile number, profile picture, preferred language, or personal description which may include sensitive Personal Data that reveals religious beliefs, political or philosophical views, disability, sexual orientation as well as biometric data. You can set your profile to “Private” at any time.
Information you provide when you contact us
. Information you disclose when you respond to surveys, or contact our customer support teams, such as Services you have used, recorded conversations, chat conversations with us, email correspondence with us, account or profile status, repayment history, voice identification. This may include information about others if you choose to share it with us.
Device Information.
Information that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Inferred data.
We may derive inferences from your transactions and personal data when you use the Services. We do this, for example, to help keep your account and profile secure and protect your use of the Services from fraud. We may draw inferences that reflect your behaviour patterns and personal preferences, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
Categories of Personal Data
collected from third parties,
including from identity verification vendors, data brokers, vendors that help us with fraud detection, your bank, Partners and Merchants or third party platforms you engage with using our Services:
Information from your connected third party accounts
. If you choose to connect non-financial or financial account such as your personal email, social media, or bank or credit accounts, we will collect information consistent with the disclosed purpose for which it was linked. For example, if you choose to participate in
Open Banking
, we will collect account credentials, account balances, account transactions, and information about your financial standing from your linked accounts. You may change your mind about use of this feature and unlink your connected accounts at any time.
Information from Credit Reporting Agencies
. Where permitted by law, we collect credit-related information such as outstanding and historical debt, repayment history, previous credit approvals, current employment relationship, and relationship with other financial institutions within the framework of your use of our Services.
Transaction Information
. Information about your order details and purchases, such as item description, quantity, price, currency, shipping address, online shopping cart information, seller and buyer information, and Payment Information. This includes information from your transactions where you use our Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Guest checkout).
Information related to legal requirements
. Consistent with applicable law (such as anti-money laundering laws), this may include information from external sanction lists such as name, date of birth, place of birth, occupation, and the reason why the person is on the list in question.
Third party applications
. Information from others from your use of third-party applications, such as the Apple App Store or Google Play Store, social networking sites, such as name, your social network ID, Location Information, email, device ID, browser ID, and profile picture. Your use of third-party applications is subject to the privacy notice and terms of service for such applications.
Categories of Personal Data automatically collected about you, including through your access to our website or mobile app, from cookies and similar tracking technologies, and your devices:
Technical Usage Data
. Information about response time for web pages, download errors and date and time when you used the service, such as your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies (“
Technical Usage Data
”).
Information from your device
. Information about your language settings, IP address, browser ID, device ID, cookie preferences, time zone, operating system, platform, screen resolution and similar information about your device settings, and data collected from cookies or other tracking technologies,
Location Information
. Information from IP-based geolocation such as latitude and longitude data, and Global Positioning System (GPS) information when you give us permission through your device settings.
Inferred data
. Inferences drawn to create a profile about you that may reflect behavior patterns and personal preferences, such as gender, income, browsing and purchasing habits, and creditworthiness.
5. What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
We may
process
your Personal Data for a variety of reasons that are permitted under data protection laws applicable in the UK and in accordance with the lawful bases below:
We collect the following Personal Data we consider
necessary to fulfil our pre-contractual and contractual obligations
to you and without which you will not be able to use the Services.
Necessary categories of Personal Data include:
Registration and Contact Information
Identification and Signature Information
Payment Information
Information related to legal requirements
Information you provide when you contact us
Transaction information
Package Tracking
Service-specific Personal Data
Information from credit reporting agencies and financial institutions
Information from your connected financial accounts
Information from your use of the Services
Technical usage data
Device information
Location data
These activities include
:
to provide our Services, to fulfil relevant agreements with you and to otherwise administer our business relationship with you. If you are using Fastlane, we will also use your Personal Data and payment method details to determine whether the payment you are making with a participating Partner or Merchant is authorised by you and likely to be successfully authorised by the payment method you choose to use when you make a purchase using details from your Fastlane profile.
to administer your payment for products and the customer relationship.
to assess your creditworthiness in connection with your application, confirm your identity and your contact information, and protect you and others from fraud.
to confirm your identity, also through the use of electronic signature, and verify your personal and contact details.
to prove that transactions have been executed.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to comply with internal procedures.
to assess which payment options and services to offer you, for example by carrying out internal and external credit assessments.
for customer analysis, to administer our Services, and for internal operations, for example troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research and statistical purposes.
to communicate with you in relation to our Services.
to comply with applicable UK laws, such as anti-money laundering and booking keeping laws and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks.
We have a legitimate interest in ensuring that PayPal remains a secure financial service and continuing to offer services that are innovative and of interest to you. We do this where
our legitimate interests are not outweighed by your right not to have your data processed for this purpose
.
These activities include:
to ensure that content is presented in the most effective way for you and your device.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to determine your eligibility for and to communicate with you about Services for which you may qualify or that may be of interest to you, for example by carrying out internal credit assessments.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to improve our Services and for general business development purposes, for example improving risk models to minimize fraud, develop new products and features and explore new business opportunities.
To keep your account, profile and financial information accurate and up to date.
for marketing, product and customer analysis, including testing, for example to improve our product range and optimize our customer offerings.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering, bookkeeping laws, regulatory capital adequacy requirements, and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities where we are not compelled by UK law but where we have a good faith belief that sharing the information is necessary to comply with applicable law.
to facilitate your participation in competitions, offerings, and events.
to conduct financial risk management obligations such as credit performance and quality, insurance risks and compliance with capital adequacy requirements under applicable law
to process information about your contacts to make it easy for you to find and connect them and improve payment accuracy.
By providing us with information about your contacts you certify that you have permission to provide that information to PayPal for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement.
to provide you with information, news, and marketing about our Services, including where we partner with others to offer similar services.
to associate information about you to identify your use of Services without a PayPal account (e.g. Pay Without a PayPal account), and to associate such transactions with your PayPal account, if you have one or later establish an account.
to remember your preferences for the next time you use the Services, such as which of your payment methods you prefer or whether you choose to receive digital receipts via email or text when you checkout.
We have a legal obligation under UK laws to conduct certain processing activities.
We do this where it is necessary to comply with applicable laws
.
These activities include:
to provide our Services and products.
to certify your identity, also for signature purposes, and verify your personal and contact details.
to establish, exercise or defend a legal claim or collection procedures.
to prevent misuse of our Services as part of our efforts to keep our platform safe and secure.
to carry out risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management.
to comply with applicable laws, such as anti-money laundering and bookkeeping laws and regulatory capital adequacy requirements and rules issued by our designated banks and relevant card networks. For example, when we process Personal Data for know-your-customer (“KYC”) requirements, to prevent, detect and investigate money laundering, terrorist financing and fraud. We also carry out sanction screening, report to tax authorities, police enforcement authorities, enforcement authorities, supervisory authorities.
We rely on your explicit and voluntary consent
to process your Personal Data to participate in certain features that while not necessary for use of the Services may be of interest to you, such as syncing your contact list to your account, providing biometric data, targeted advertising, linking your email account for package tracking or connecting to a third-party platform. You may change your mind about use of these features at any time through your account settings. Note that withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we have conducted prior to your withdrawal. Please refer to Section 10 (“
Your data protection rights
”) for more information on your right to withdraw your consent.
6. Do We Share Personal Data, and why?
We will share your Personal Data with third parties where there is a lawful basis to do so.
This includes:
With other Other Services
, in order to provide you with the Services and for our own legitimate interests in conducting our business. These interests are described further in Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which legal basis?
”)
.
With authorities
, to the extent we are under a legal obligation to do so. Such authorities include tax authorities, police authorities, enforcement authorities and supervisory authorities in relevant countries. We may also be required to provide competent authorities information about your use of our Services, for example revenue or tax authorities, which may include your name, address and information regarding card transactions processed by us on your behalf through our Services. The legal basis for complying with disclosure obligations under UK law is legal obligation and where acting under non-UK law, on the basis of our legitimate interest to comply with relevant laws to deter illegal conduct.
With other financial institutions and card networks
, for example to facilitate payment processing, to jointly offer a product or to add cards to your electronic wallet. For payment transactions with Fastlane, your Personal Data will be shared with the provider of the payment services for the participating Partner and Merchant to enable the processing of the payment transaction. The payment provider for the Partner and Merchant may be PayPal or a third party payment provider. The legal basis for our disclosure is performance of our contract with you. These parties may also access your Personal Data for other legitimate purposes such as identity verification, fraud prevention and risk management. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
, for example to assist us in detecting activities suggestive of fraud. The legal basis for this processing is the legitimate interest of ourselves and our Partners and Merchants to deter fraudulent and illegal conduct.
With debt collection agencies,
for example to collect unpaid overdue debts through a third party such as a debt collection agency. We do this on the basis of our legitimate interest to conduct business and recover debts. Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them, and they may report your unpaid debts to credit reporting agencies which may affect your creditworthiness or ability to secure future credit.
With service providers
that operate at our direction and on our behalf to perform services we outsource to them, such as marketing, IT development, maintenance, hosting and support and customer service operations. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With other Users in accordance with your account settings
. You may display or make certain information available to other Users, such as your profile photo, first and last name, username, or city in accordance with your account settings. The legal basis for this processing is your consent. Please note that you can change your profile settings at any time and at no cost to you.
With financial institutions in connection with your participation in Open Banking
, for example when you initiate an account connection with another bank, card account, or aggregator. We do this to check if you have sufficient funds or confirm your ownership of the account. When you choose to link your account the legal basis for accessing your account data is performance of our contractual obligations to you.
With Partners and Merchants, their service providers and others involved in a transaction
, for example when you use the Services to initiate online purchases, save your payment information with Fastlane, pay other Users, use the Services, or return goods we may share information about you and your account or Fastlane profile with the other parties (or their service providers) involved in processing your transactions. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of our contractual obligations to you and for our legitimate interests. We may also disclose Personal Data to Partners and Merchants to enable their use of our Services to facilitate your transactions. For example, when you visit a participating Merchant site or app, the Merchant can check whether you are a user of PayPal services and present a recommended payment method to you to simplify your checkout process. If you choose to interact with participating Partners and Merchants through Fastlane, we will disclose your Fastlane profile information with the participating Partners and Merchants and their services providers, and facilitate your transaction, shopping experience or other interaction on participating Partners and Merchants sites.
Please note that Personal Data shared with Partners and Merchants (or their service providers) involved in a transaction is subject to the Partners and Merchants’ own privacy policies and procedures.  We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of Partners and Merchants.
With third parties that are independent data controllers
, for example when we share Personal Data to credit reference agencies, acquirers and other financial institutions, or security products to prevent bots from accessing our Services.
Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the processing of Personal Data that you share directly with them
. For example, we use Google’s reCAPTCHA to prevent misuse of our Services, when you access our mobile application. Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
apply to the processing of Personal Data you share with them. For more information specific to credit reference agencies we partner to assess your creditworthiness, see Section 12, (“
Credit Reference Agency Information Notice
”).
With buyers or in connection with business transfer
, for example if we sell business or assets, we may share your Personal Data to a buyer of those business or assets. If PayPal or a significant portion of PayPal’s assets are acquired by a third party, Personal Data may also be shared. PayPal has a legitimate interest in being able to carry out these transactions.
7. How long does PayPal store your Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data for as long as needed or permitted in context of the purpose for which it was collected and consistent with applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention period is as follows:
Personal Data used for the ongoing relationship between you and PayPal is stored for the duration of the relationship plus a period of 10 years
Personal Data in relation to a legal obligation to which we are subject is retained consistent with the applicable law, such as under applicable bankruptcy laws and AML obligations.
We retain Personal Data for the least amount of time necessary where retention is advisable in light of litigation, investigations, audit and compliance practices, or to protect against legal claims.
8. International Transfers of Personal Data
We operate in many countries, and we (or our service providers) may move your data and process it outside the country where you live. We use third-party service providers to process and store your information in the United States and other countries. These countries do not always afford an equivalent level of privacy protection. We have taken specific steps, in accordance with UK data protection laws, to protect your Personal Data. For transfers of Personal Data from the EU within PayPal and Other Services, we rely on Binding Corporate Rules approved by competent Supervisory Authorities (available
here
). For transfers of personal data from the UK, these are based on the UK Addendum (approved by the Information Commissioner’s Office) to the EU standard contractual clauses, approved by the European Commission, to help ensure your information is afforded a high standard of protection and that your privacy rights are respected.
9. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you interact with our Services, open email we send you, or visit a third-party website for which we provide Services, we and our partners use cookies and other tracking technologies such as pixel tags, web beacons, and widgets (collectively, “
Cookies
”) to recognise you as a User, customise your online experiences and online content, including to serve you interest-based advertising, perform analytics; mitigate risk and prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you decline certain Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
We use Cookies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and inferences as described above.
Cookies help us to do the following:
Remember your information so you do not have to re-enter it
Track and understand how you use and interact with our online services and emails
Tailor our online services to your preferences
Measure how useful and effective our services and communications are to you
Otherwise manage and enhance our products and services
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third parties. At this time our Sites are not designed to respond to DNT signals or similar mechanisms from browsers.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about our use of Cookies.
10. Your Data Protection Rights
Under applicable data protection law, you have certain rights to control our collection and use of your Personal Data. Your rights include:
Access, rectification, deletion, objection, portability, and restriction of your Personal Data
We recognize the importance of your ability to control use of your Personal Data and provide several ways for you to exercise your rights to access (right to know), rectification (correction or update), deletion (erasure), objection, portability (transferring), and to restrict process in whole or in part.
If you have an account you can exercise your data protection rights by accessing “Data and Privacy” from account settings in the PayPal app. If you, or an authorised agent, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Data in your Fastlane profile, contact us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section or submit your request from your Fastlane profile management portal.
Even if you do not you have a PayPal account (for example, where you use Pay without a PayPal account), you can submit a request for access, modification, correction, or deletion of your information Personal Data by contacting us at the number provided in the Our Contact Information section. You can submit a request related to someone else’s information, if you are their authorised agent, by contacting us. Please note that we may require you to provide additional information for verification.
Your right to object to the Automated Decisions and profiling
If you are not approved under the Automated Decisions described below, you will not have access to our services, such as our payment methods. PayPal has several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. If you have any concern about the outcome, you can
contact us
, and we will determine whether the procedure was performed appropriately.
You have the right to object to an Automated Decision with legal consequences or decisions which can otherwise significantly affect you (together with the relevant profiling) by
contacting us
. We will then review the decision, taking into account relevant additional circumstances.
Consent
Generally, if we use your Personal Data with your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your Personal Data conducted in reliance on a lawful processing ground other than consent.
Right to object to Direct Marketing
If we use your Personal Data for direct marketing, you can always modify your permissions, object and opt out of future direct marketing messages using the unsubscribe link in electronic communications or through your account or profile settings.
Right to object to Legitimate Interest processing
If we use your Personal Data to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third-party, you have the right to object to our use for that purpose. See Section 5 (“
What Personal Data is used and for which Legal Basis?
”)
How do you exercise your rights and how can you contact us or the data protection authority?
If you are unhappy with our processing of your Personal Data for any reason, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority for data protection in your country.
By contacting our Data Protection Officer, please see Section 18 (“
Our Contact Information
”).
You may also seek a remedy through
local courts
if you believe your rights have been breached.
You may also lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority, which in the UK is the Information Commissioner’s Office: website: https://ico.org.uk/, address: Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF.
11. Specific information about automated decision-making and profiling
“
Automated-decision making”
is the process of making a decision by fully automated means without human involvement. In some cases these decisions
could have a legal or similarly significant
effect on you as an individual. “
Profiling
” means analysis of an individual's personality, behaviour, interest and habits to make predictions or decisions about them. Where authorised under UK law or where necessary for the entry into or performance of a contract, we may in some cases use automated decision-making or profiling for decisions. An example of our use of automated decision making is evaluation of your creditworthiness to assess your suitability for certain credit products.
We believe that by making such decisions automatically, PayPal increases its objectivity and transparency in deciding which services to offer you. We deploy several safety mechanisms to ensure the decisions are appropriate. These mechanisms include ongoing overviews of our decision models and random sampling in individual cases. You can always ask for a manual decision-making process instead, express your opinion or contest decision making based solely on automated processing, including profiling, if such a decision would produce
legal effects or otherwise similarly significantly affect you
. You can find out more about how to object to these decisions in Section 10
(“Your data protection rights”)
.
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
if you require more information on our use of Automated-decision making or Profiling.
12. Why do we share your Personal Data with credit reference agencies?
If you have applied for or use our credit Services, in order to process your application, we may supply your Personal Data to credit reference agencies (CRAs) and they will give us information about you, such as your financial history. We do this to assess creditworthiness and product suitability, check your identity, trace and recover debts and prevent criminal activity.
The legal bases for such transmissions are found in Article 6, paragraph 1, letter b (contractual) and Article 6, paragraph 1, letter f (legitimate interest) of the UK General Data Protection Regulation (“UK GDPR”).
We will also continue to exchange information about you with CRAs on an ongoing basis, including about your settled accounts and any debts not fully repaid on time. This information may be supplied by CRAs to other organizations to perform similar checks and to trace your whereabouts and recover debts that you owe.
Your data will also be linked to the data of any joint applicants or other financial associates.
How to Find Out More
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
for details of which CRA we have used for a specific search.
The list of CRAs used in the UK and EEA, can be found
here
, including identities of the CRAs used in each relevant country, and a link to their privacy notice from which you can determine the ways in which they use and share Personal Data, including how long they will retain such Personal Data. You can contact the credit reference agencies operating in the country in which you live directly if you have any questions regarding their services, your credit score or the information they have stored about you, or if you wish to exercise your data subject rights towards them.
13. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorised access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centres, and information access authorisation controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorised.
14. Can Children Use Our Services?
We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from children under the age of 16 or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from someone not allowed to use our Services, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Please
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from someone not allowed to use our Services.
15. Updates to this Privacy Statement
We revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, Services, or applicable laws. If the revised version requires notice in accordance with applicable law, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the "
Policy Updates
" or "
Privacy Statement
" page of our website, otherwise the revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. If you are a new User or are receiving this Privacy Statement for the first time and there is an upcoming change described on the
Policy Updates
or Privacy Statement page at the time you receive this Privacy Statement, such upcoming change will apply to you on the indicated effective date.
16. Users in the UK
In order to provide the PayPal Services, certain of the information we collect (as set out in this Privacy Statement) may be required to be transferred to other PayPal related companies or other entities, including those referred to in this section in their capacity as payment providers, payment processors or account holders (or similar capacities). You acknowledge that according to their local legislation, such entities may be subject to laws, regulations, inquiries, investigations, or orders which may require the disclosure of information to the relevant authorities of the relevant country.
Specifically, you acknowledge that PayPal may do any and all of the following with your information:
Disclose necessary information to: the police and other law enforcement agencies; security forces; competent governmental, intergovernmental or supranational bodies; competent agencies, departments, regulatory authorities, self-regulatory authorities or organisations and other third parties, including PayPal Group companies, that (i) we are legally compelled and permitted to comply with, including but without limitation laws implementing the US Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act (“FATCA”) and OECD Common Reporting Standard (“CRS”); (ii) we have reason to believe it is appropriate for us to cooperate with in investigations of fraud or other illegal activity or potential illegal activity, or (iii) to conduct investigations of violations of our User Agreement (including without limitation, your funding source or credit or debit card provider).
If you are covered by FATCA or CRS, we are required to give you notice of the information about you that we may transfer to various authorities.
We and other organisations, including parties that accept PayPal, may also share, access and use (including from other countries) necessary information (including, without limitation the information recorded by fraud prevention agencies) to help us and them assess and to manage risk (including, without limitation, to prevent fraud, money laundering and terrorist financing). Please contact us if you want to receive further details of the relevant fraud prevention agencies.
Disclose account Information to intellectual property right owners if under applicable law they have a claim against PayPal for an out-of-court information disclosure due to an infringement of their intellectual property rights for which PayPal Services have been used.
Disclose necessary information in response to the requirements of the credit card associations or a civil or criminal legal process.
Disclose your name and PayPal link in the PayPal user directory. Your details will be confirmed to other PayPal users in response to a user searching using your name, email address or telephone number, or part of these details. This is to ensure people make payments to the correct user. This feature can be turned off in the PayPal profile settings.
If you as a Partner and Merchant use a third party to access or integrate PayPal, we may disclose to any such third party necessary information for the purpose of facilitating and maintaining such an arrangement (including, without limitation, the status of your PayPal integration, whether you have an active PayPal account and whether you may already be working with a different PayPal integration partner).
Disclose necessary information to the payment processors, auditors, customer services providers, credit reference and fraud agencies, financial products providers, commercial partners, marketing and public relations companies, operational services providers, group companies, agencies, marketplaces and other third parties listed here. The purpose of this disclosure is to allow us to provide PayPal Services to you. We also set out in the list of third parties, under each "Category", non-exclusive examples of the actual third parties (which may include their assigns and successors) to whom we currently disclose your account information or to whom we may consider disclosing your account information, together with the purpose of doing so, and the actual information we disclose (except as explicitly stated, these third parties are limited by law or by contract from using the information for secondary purposes beyond the purposes for which the information was shared).
Disclose necessary information to your agent or legal representative (such as the holder of a power of attorney that you grant, or a guardian appointed for you).
Disclose aggregated statistical data with our business partners or for public relations. For example, we may disclose that a specific percentage of our users live in Manchester. However, this aggregated information is not tied to Personal Data.
Share necessary account information with unaffiliated third parties (listed here) for their use for the following purposes:
Fraud Prevention and Risk Management: to help prevent fraud or assess and manage risk.
Customer Service: for customer service purposes, including to help service your accounts or resolve disputes (e.g., billing or transactional).
Shipping: in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using PayPal.
Legal Compliance: to help them comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing verification requirements.
Service Providers: to enable service providers under contract with us to support our business operations, such as fraud prevention, bill collection, marketing, customer service and technology services. Our contracts dictate that these service providers only use your information in connection with the services they perform for us and not for their own benefit.
17. Definitions
Device Information means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Site or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data.
Other Services means companies or separate brands, affiliates or subsidiaries of PayPal, Inc., and who process Personal Data in accordance with their terms of service and privacy policies. Examples include Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., and Hyperwallet.
Geolocation Information means information that identifies, with precise specificity, your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through your GPS, or your device settings.
Location Information means information that identifies, with reasonable specificity, your approximate location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS or Wi-Fi or cell site triangulation.
Partner and Merchant means the merchant or business that our Users transact with for the purpose of obtaining goods or services.
Pay Without a PayPal account means our Services may be accessed by individuals without using a PayPal account, a Fastlane profile, or the Unbranded Payment Services.
PayPal means PayPal UK Ltd, which offers PayPal, Xoom, Unbranded Payment Services and Fastlane profile services.
Personal Data means information that can be associated with an identified or directly or indirectly identifiable natural person. “Personal Data” can include, but is not limited to, name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, national ID, passport number), and biometrics.
Processing means any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether by automated means, such as by collection, recording, categorization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services  means any PayPal Unbranded Payment Services, Pay Without a PayPal account, PayPal Groups, Fastlane, Xoom, credit products and services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal, with the exception of the Other Services. Your use of the Services includes use of our Sites.
Sites means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Unbranded Payment Services means you are interacting with and making payments to Partners and Merchants using our card and/or direct debit payment services that do not carry the PayPal brand, or when you use our Braintree services.
User is any person who uses the Services as a consumer for personal or household use. For the purposes of this Notice, “User” includes “you” and “your”.
18. Our Contact Information
Contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
Online
or offline at PayPal UK Ltd at 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal Account or Service or Unbranded Payment Services.
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom Account or Service.
To contact us about your Fastlane profile: visit your Fastlane profile management portal.
Status disclosure
PayPal UK Ltd is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) as an electronic money institution (firm reference number 994790); in relation to its regulated consumer credit activities (firm reference number 996405); and for the provision of cryptocurrency services (firm reference number 1000741). Some products and services, such as PayPal Pay in 3 and PayPal Working Capital, are not regulated by the FCA and may offer a lower level of protection. Please read product terms for further details. PayPal UK Ltd's company number is 14741686. Its registered office is 5 Fleet Place, London, United Kingdom, EC4M 7RD.
Sub-policy 7
https://www.coinbase.com/legal/privacy?locale=en:
Coinbase Global Privacy Policy
Last Updated: March 26, 2024
.
We at Coinbase (the Coinbase entities listed in
Section 11 below
, referred to here as “
we
”, “
us
” or “
our
”) respect and protect the privacy of those who explore our Services (“
Users
”) and Users who sign up for and access our Services (“
Customers
”) (together referred throughout this policy as “
you
” and “
your
”).
This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, use, and share personal information when you explore, sign up for or access our
“Services”
, which include the services offered on our websites, including
coinbase.com
,
coinbase.com/exchange
,
coinbase.com/prime
,
coinbase.com/futures
,
coinbase.com/cloud
(each a “
Site
” and collectively the "
Sites
") or when you use the Coinbase mobile app, the Coinbase Card App, Coinbase Exchange, Coinbase Prime, Dapp Wallet, or Coinbase Custody application programming interface (“
API
”) or third party applications relying on such APIs (together, our “
Apps
”) and related services.
If you reside outside of the UK and the European Economic Area (the “
EEA
”), accessing and using our Services means that you accept this Privacy Policy and its terms.
It is important that you understand how we use your information. You should read this page in full, but below are the key highlights and some helpful links:
Our goal is to simplify your crypto experience. If you do not wish for your personal information to be collected, used, or disclosed as described in this Privacy Policy, or you are under 18 years of age, you should stop accessing our Services.
We collect and use your information in order to provide and improve our Services and your experience, protect the security and integrity of our platform, and meet our legal obligations.
To learn more, explore
Section 1. What Information We Collect
and
Section 2. How We Use Your Information
.
We share your information with other Coinbase companies, as well as trusted third parties and service providers, in order to offer our Services and fulfill legal requirements.
To learn more, explore
Section 3. How And Why We Share Your Information
.
We offer privacy tools for you to request access to or deletion of information we hold about you. You can use these tools by visiting your
Privacy Rights Dashboard
. Depending on where you live, you may also have other privacy rights under law.
If you have any questions, please contact us on our
Support Portal
or at dpo@coinbase.com. See
Section 9. How to Contact Us With Questions
for more information.
1. WHAT INFORMATION WE COLLECT
We collect the following personal information and documentation:
Information You Provide to Us

Information Category
Description
Basic Customer Information
Name, Address, Date of birth, Nationality, Country of residence, Gender, Phone number, Email Address
Supplemental Identification Information
Utility bills (for your billing address), Photographs and/or videos, Government-issued identity document, e.g. passport, driver’s license, or state identification card, Social security number, Employment information (e.g. company name), Proof of residency, including visa information
Electronic Identification (“
EIDV
”) Information
Biometric information generated based on photos or videos you provide in order for us to verify your identity
Institutional Information (if you are an institutional Customer)
Employer Identification number (or comparable number issued by a government), Personal identification information for all material beneficial owners of your business
Financial Information
Bank account number, Payment card primary account number ("
PAN
"), Trading and investment experience, Tax identification number, Income/net assets/wealth verification statements
Wallet Information
When you sign up to use our Web3 browser, self-custody, or multi-coin crypto wallet, and connect it to your Coinbase account, we collect your Wallet address and information related to integrations that you select
Preferences
The digital asset(s) you choose to be paid in through our Direct Deposit service, Settings and preferences you select in the Coinbase app
Transaction Information
Information about the transactions made on our Services, such as the name of the sender, the name of the recipient, the amount, currency preferences, payment method, date, and/or timestamp
Additional information you submit to us
Communications:
Survey responses, information (including call recordings) provided to our Customer Support team or User Research team,
including communications with interfaces such as our chatbots.
Referral Information:
Your contacts’ phone or email addresses if you choose to invite friends to Coinbase (available only in certain countries outside the EEA)
Information Collected Automatically

Information Category
Description
App, browser, and device information
Information about the device, operating system, and browser you’re using
Other device characteristics or identifiers (e.g. plugins, the network you connect to)
IP address
Product Usage Information
Activity information:
Information about what you view or click on while visiting our Sites and Apps and how you use our Services
Diagnostic and Troubleshooting Information:
Information about how our Services are performing when you use them, i.e. service-related diagnostic and performance information, including timestamps, crash data, website performance logs, and error messages or reports
Information from cookies and similar technologies
See our
Cookies Policy
for more information
Information we obtain from Affiliates and third parties

Information Category
Description
Coinbase Group of Companies (“
Affiliates
”)
We may obtain information about you, such as Basic Customer Information, Transaction Information and Product Usage Information, from our Affiliates as a normal part of conducting business. For instance, if you link your various Coinbase accounts e.g. your Coinbase Wallet account or your Coinbase Commerce account, we may utilize your Wallet Information and Financial Information in order to convert cryptocurrency into fiat and allow you to make withdrawals into your bank account. For more information, please see
Section 3. How and Why We Share Your Information
Public Database Information
We obtain information about you from public databases, such as the United Nations Sanctions List, US ITA Consolidated Screening List, and the SEC EDGAR, including your name, address, email address, phone number, gender, national ID number and nationality/country of residence, date of birth, job role, public employment profile, listing on any sanctions lists maintained by public authorities, and other data as necessary
Blockchain Data
We may analyze public blockchain data, including timestamps of transactions or events, transaction IDs, digital signatures, transaction amounts, and wallet addresses
Information from our Marketing and Advertising Partners
We receive information such as your name and contact information from our marketing partners, including in some instances what marketing content you viewed or the  actions you take on our Sites
Information from Analytics Providers
We receive information about your Site usage, interactions, age group, and survey responses (including prior to account creation, in some cases)
Retail Merchant Information
If you use your Coinbase account to conduct a transaction with a third party merchant, the merchant may provide us with data about you, such as your name and contact details, and your transaction with that merchant
Research and In-App Survey Information
We use third party service providers to conduct in-app surveys to better understand our Customers’ experience and improve our Services. The information we receive from our research partners is pseudonymous
2. HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
We use your personal information to deliver, personalize, operate, improve, create, and develop our Services, to provide you with a secure, smooth, efficient and customized experience as you use them, and for legal compliance, loss prevention, and anti-fraud purposes. Learn more about how we use your personal information and our legal basis for each such data use:
Data use necessary to perform our contract with you

We use certain information that is necessary to conclude and perform our
Customer Agreement
or other relevant contract(s) with you. We will need to terminate your account if we cannot process your personal information for such purposes.
Why and How We Use Your Information
Information Categories Used
To create and maintain your Coinbase account
In order to provide you with our Services, and to allow you to set up a customer account and profile.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Financial Information
To provide you with Consumer Services
In order to provide you with personalized Services to invest (such as buy or sell), save, earn, spend, stake, and borrow within your account, including hosting and maintaining your digital wallets, including your E-Money Wallet, Digital Currency Wallet, and Web3 Wallet (when you connect them to your Coinbase account)
and to provide you with
Verified by Coinbase
.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Financial Information, Institutional Information, Transaction Information, Wallet Information, Preferences, Blockchain Data, Product Usage Information, Additional information you submit to us (not including Referral Information, which we do not retain)
To provide you with Institutional Services
In order to provide Services to you, investors and institutions to allow investing, payment, asset listings, and account management.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Financial Information, Institutional Information, Additional information you submit to us, Wallet Information, Transaction Information
To provide you with Developer Services
In order to provide you with Coinbase Pay,  a payment feature that allows you to buy or transfer supported crypto on Coinbase to your wallet, and Direct Deposit, which allows you to get your salary paid in the cryptocurrency of your choice, asset controls, and connects merchants to Users or Customers to allow acceptance and provision of crypto payments.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Financial Information, Preferences
To provide you with Coinbase Cloud Services
In order to provide you with our Coinbase Cloud services, which offers tools, APIs and infrastructure for Web3 development and, staking services.
Basic Customer Information, Transaction Information, Wallet Information, Financial Information, Blockchain Data
To provide customer support
To address your request for support in the Apps, via the Sites or by email and to respond to customer care and other inquiries, including providing telephone-based premium customer support to Customers (who provide their telephone numbers), chat message support (including chatbots), and social support.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information (including Location Information), Communications
To send Service communications
To send you administrative or account-related communications about our Services, which can include security updates or transaction-related information, through email, telephone, or in-product/push notifications. You may not opt-out of receiving critical service communications, such as emails or mobile notifications sent for legal or security purposes.
Basic Customer Information, Product Usage Information, Communications, Transaction Information
To promote the safety, security and integrity of our Services
To verify accounts and related activity, find and address violations of our Customer
Agreement
or policies (including our
Prohibited & Conditional Use Policy
), investigate suspicious activity, detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behaviour, detect fraudulent behaviour and to maintain the integrity of our Services, including account takeover (“
ATO
”) prevention and support.
Basic Customer Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information, Supplemental Identification Information,  Institutional Information, Financial Information, Communications, Additional information you submit to us
Data use to comply with our legal obligations

Our Services are subject to laws and regulations requiring us to collect, use, and store your personal information in certain ways. If you do not provide the personal information required by law, we will have to close your account.
Why and How We Use Your Information
Information Categories Used
To verify your identity
We are generally required to collect various pieces of personal information to properly identify or verify your identity and comply with other specific anti-money laundering (“
AML
”) or sanctions laws/regulations (e.g. funds transfer rules).  Our verification processes also involve electronic identification through the comparison of your ‘selfie’ against your provided verification information.  All such information is securely maintained by Coinbase and its service providers, and is only disclosed where permitted by law.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, EIDV Information
To determine your legal eligibility for certain regulated products
When you use certain locally regulated products or engage in certain advanced trading activities, we may be required to carry out additional checks to ensure your suitability (e.g. under the European Market Infrastructure Regulation).
Basic Customer Information, Financial Information, Supplemental Identification Information
To comply with other legal and regulatory obligations
We may access, read, preserve, and disclose information when we believe it is reasonably necessary to comply with law, legal obligations, regulations, law enforcement, governmental, and other legal requests, court orders, or for disclosure to tax authorities.
Examples of laws that may require us to collect, use or disclose your information:
Civil, commercial, criminal, or consumer protection matters:
where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings or regulatory inquiries (e.g. orders or mandatory requests under the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014, US federal and state consumer protection and privacy laws, subpoenas from any court with jurisdiction, and/or Singapore Criminal Procedure Code 2010).
Corporate and taxation matters:
obligations such as the Irish Companies Act 2014 and the Taxes Consolidation Act 1997, and the Internal Revenue Service code.
Regulatory matters
: to comply with our regulatory obligations, including  engaging with our regulators, such as (but not limited to) the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the National Futures Association, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, the Central Bank of Ireland,
the UK Financial Conduct Authority,
the German federal financial supervisory authority ("
BaFin
"), the Monetary Authority of Singapore, and the Australian Securities and Investments Commission.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information , Institutional Information, Wallet Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information, Communications Information, Blockchain Data
Data use for our Legitimate Interests

We rely on our legitimate interests or those of third parties (like our other Customers and in some cases, the general public) where they are not outweighed by your rights and freedoms. In the EEA and UK, you have the right to object to, and seek the restriction of, this processing. See
Section 7. Your Privacy Rights and Choices
for more information.
Why and How We Use Your Information
Legitimate Interests Relied On
Information Categories Used
To customize your experience with our Services and otherwise improve our Services
In order to perform core metrics, customize your experience with our Services and to generally improve our Services, we collect information about your online activity while you are using the Services (for example, when and how often pages on our Sites are visited, and our Services are used).
It is in our interest to understand how you interact with the Services in order to customize and/or improve our products and Services and enable accurate and reliable reporting.
Basic Customer Information, Product Usage Information, Transaction Information
To provide marketing communications to you
We use your information to send you targeted  marketing communications through email, mobile, in-app and push notifications or by SMS.
You may also see ads for our Services when you visit other apps and websites.
It is in our interest to promote Coinbase products and Services that you may be interested in.
Basic Customer Information, Institutional Information, Product Usage Information, Transaction Information, Information from our Marketing Partners
To provide you with promotions
We use your information to provide promotions, including sweepstakes offers or other incentives and rewards for using our Services.
It is in our interest and your interest to reward customer loyalty.
Basic Customer Information, Wallet Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Transaction Information
We preserve and share information with others, including law enforcement, civil litigants, and others who may issue legal requests
Where not otherwise required by law, and depending on the circumstances, we may preserve and share your information:
- in response to requests from third parties, such as civil litigants, law enforcement, and other government authorities, for example to assist authorities in the investigation of fraud;
- to promote the safety, security, and integrity of the Coinbase Service, network, our Customers, Users, employees, property and the public;
- when we seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation or other disputes, such as violations of our Customer Agreement and policies; and/or
- to respond to Customer/claimant requests or communications, reviewing Customer accounts and transactions for litigation disputes, and recording account details for litigation and settlement purposes.
It is in our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorized use of the Services, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Coinbase personnel and property or the Service), our Customers or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory inquiries; to defend our legal rights and resolve disputes; to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent and address fraud, abuse, spam and other bad experiences or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Institutional Information, Wallet Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information, Communications Information, Blockchain Data
To promote safety, security and integrity
Outside of performing our contract with you, we may use and analyze your information  to protect the integrity of our Services. For example, we may use it to:
- log customer reports and patterns of suspicious behaviour to understand techniques being used by bad actors who may wish to interfere with the Services; and
- to identify and investigate patterns of suspicious behaviour or violations of our policies and Terms.
It is in our interest and the interests of our Users and Customers to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent and address fraud, abuse, spam and other bad experiences.
Any of the categories of information listed in
Section 1. What Information We Collect.
To research and innovate
We carry out surveys of your experience using the Services and the trading that you engage in to conduct and support research and innovation on topics related to our Services.
It is in our interest and our Customers’ interest to improve and iterate our Services through information obtained from these research surveys and interviews.
Basic Customer Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information, Communications, Research and In-App Survey Information
To provide customer support
To provide communications and customer support through our Customer Support team and User Research team, including communications with interfaces such as our chatbots.
It is in our interest and our Customers’ interest to provide customer support and improve our Services.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Additional Information you submit to us
Data use based on your consent

When we use your information based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time on a go-forward basis (which will not affect our prior use of your data, based on your previously given consent). You may change your device-based or in-app settings anytime as described in
Section 7. Your Privacy Rights and Choices.
Why and How We Use Your Information
Information Categories Used
To enable device-based settings
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser, and device information
To provide marketing communications to you
To send you targeted marketing communications through email, mobile, in-app, and push notifications or by SMS.
You may also see ads for our Services when you visit other apps and websites
Basic Customer Information, Institutional Information, Product Usage Information, Transaction Information, Information from our Marketing Partners, Additional information You Provide to Us
Data use to protect your or others’ vital interests

Why and How We Use Your Information
Information Categories Used
Preserving, reviewing, and sharing information with law enforcement and others
We may preserve, review, and share information with law enforcement and others in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. For example, where there is a risk to the well-being or life of a Coinbase Customer.
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, Institutional Information, Wallet Information, Transaction Information, Product Usage Information, Communications Information, Blockchain Data
If you reside outside the United Kingdom or EEA, the legal bases on which we rely in your country may differ from those listed above.
3. HOW AND WHY WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION
We work with service providers, partners and other third parties to help us provide our Services, and as a result we need to share certain information with these third parties.  Here’s how:
Affiliates

Personal information that we process and collect may be transferred between companies, Services, and employees affiliated with us as a normal part of conducting business and offering our Services to you. See
Section 11. Our Relationship With You
for a list of our affiliated companies and Services.
Linked Third Party Websites

When you use third-party services (like when you connect your Coinbase account with your bank account) or websites that are linked through our Services, the providers of those services or products may receive information about you that Coinbase, you, or others share with them. Please note that when you use third-party services or Coinbase Affiliate Services which are not governed by this Privacy Policy, their own terms and privacy policies will govern your use of those services and products.
TRUST

TRUST is a global, secure, and industry-driven solution designed to comply with a requirement known as the Travel Rule while protecting your security and privacy. Coinbase and other custodial cryptocurrency exchanges and financial institutions share certain basic information about their customers when sending funds over a certain amount to another financial institution. To learn more, see
Travel Rule FinCEN Advisory
.
Professional advisors, industry partners, authorities and regulators

We share your information described in
Section 1. What Information We Collect
with our advisors, regulators, tax authorities, law enforcement, government agencies, and industry partners to:
- respond pursuant to applicable law or regulations, court orders, legal process or government requests;
- comply with our reporting and information sharing obligations with industry partners, including other Virtual Asset Service Providers (“
VASPs
”) and regulatory authorities;
- detect, investigate, prevent, or address fraud and other illegal activity or security and technical issues; and
- protect the rights, property, and safety of our Customers, Coinbase and its Affiliates, or others, including to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Asset Transfer or Company Acquisition

We may choose to buy or sell assets, and may share and/or transfer information about our Customers in connection with the evaluation of and entry into such transactions. Also, if we (or our assets) are acquired, merged, reorganized, or if we go out of business, enter bankruptcy, or go through some other change of control or similar event, your personal information could be one of the assets transferred to the acquiring party.
Third-Party Service Providers

We work with third-party service providers to help us provide our Services. When we share information with third-party service providers in this capacity, we require them to use your information on our behalf in accordance with our instructions and terms and only process as necessary for the purpose of the contract. We work with different types of third-party service providers, including:
Types of Third-Party Service Providers We Use
What Information We Share
Third-Party Electronic ID Verification Service Vendors
, including those that process biometric information
Vendors for tax reporting
Derivatives service providers
Retail merchants (to provide rewards/incentives)
Marketing and promotions providers (to promote our Services)
Telecommunications technology providers (to send you messages, including SMS messages)
CTF/AML service providers (for the purposes of transaction monitoring)
Data hosting service providers and payment vendors (for off-site data hosting)
Security service providers (for investigating fraud and security incidents)
Analytics providers (to understand how you use our Services)
Payment processing companies (to process transactions on our behalf)
Document repository services providers
Customer support vendors
Chatbots
Basic Customer Information, Supplemental Identification Information, EIDV Information, Institutional Information, Usage Information, Transaction Information, Blockchain Data, Wallet Information, Additional information you submit to us
4. HOW LONG WE RETAIN YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We retain your information as needed to provide our Services, comply with legal obligations, or protect our or others’ interests. While retention requirements vary by country, we maintain internal retention policies on the basis of how information needs to be used. This includes considerations such as when the information was collected or created, whether it is necessary in order to continue offering you our Services, whether we are required to hold the information to comply with our legal obligations, including AML/KYC compliance or other financial regulatory obligations, or information preservation requirements.
We also keep certain information where necessary to protect the safety, security and integrity of our Services, Customers, and Users. Our third-party electronic identity verification providers collect and retain biometric information for the period required for financial regulatory compliance or otherwise as required by applicable law. They retain this information for as long as set out in their
applicable notices/policies
.
In line with these considerations, we delete information that is no longer needed for the above purposes when you close your account, or when you request deletion of your information (which you can initiate through your
Privacy Rights Dashboard
).
5. CHILDREN'S PERSONAL INFORMATION
The Sites and Services are not directed to persons under the age of 18, and we do not knowingly request or collect any information about persons under the age of 18. If you are under the age of 18, please do not provide any personal information through the Sites or Services. If a User or Customer submitting personal information is suspected of being younger than 18 years of age, Coinbase will require the relevant Customer or User to close his or her account, and will take steps to delete the individual’s information as soon as possible.
6. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
To facilitate our global operations, Coinbase, its Affiliates, third-party partners, and service providers may transfer, store, and process your personal information throughout the world, including Ireland, Germany, Singapore, the UK, the US, and the Philippines.
See here for more information
.
If you reside in the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom, we rely upon a variety of legal mechanisms to facilitate these transfers of your personal information (collectively, “
European Personal Data
”).
We rely primarily on the European Commission’s Standard Contractual Clauses to facilitate the international and onward transfer of European Personal Data to third countries, including from our EU operating entities to Coinbase, Inc. in the United States. For a copy of the Standard Contractual Clauses, please contact dpo@coinbase.com.
In addition, we may rely on certain exemptions provided for under data protection law for our international transfers. We also rely on
adequacy decisions
from the European Commission where available and exemptions provided for under data protection law. For example, because Coinbase operates and provides its Services globally, we need to share information with our Affiliates and to data centers outside the EEA in order to develop, offer, and improve our Services (Article 49(1)(b) GDPR). In addition, we may rely on certain exemptions for sharing personal information with law enforcement outside of the EEA in emergency situations (Article 49(1)(f) GDPR).
EU-US, UK-US, and Swiss-US  Data Privacy Framework
Coinbase complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (together referred to as the “Data Privacy Frameworks”) and the DPF Principles as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Coinbase has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to:
the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF;
the UK-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-UK DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF; and
the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
In the context of an onward transfer, Coinbase has responsibility for the processing of personal data it receives under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as a service provider, partner and/or other third party to help us provide our Services on our behalf (as described in Section 4 of this policy). Coinbase remains liable under the DPF if any such third party processes personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF, unless Coinbase can prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Coinbase commits to resolve all DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information.  EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the relevant Data Privacy Frameworks should first contact Coinbase at:
dpo@coinbase.com
For unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal information in reliance on the Data Privacy Frameworks, Coinbase is a member of and relies upon the ICDR-AAA services for the Data Privacy Framework Program, see here
https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html
, which may involve, under certain conditions, binding arbitration.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Coinbase’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
7. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND CHOICES
Depending on where you live, you may be able to exercise certain privacy rights related to your personal information. For any of your privacy rights and choices referenced below, requests relating to your personal information can be made by logging into your account and going to your
Privacy Rights Dashboard
or by submitting a request via our
Support Portal
or at
dpo@coinbase.com
. If any of the rights listed below are not provided under law for your operating entity or jurisdiction, Coinbase has absolute discretion in providing you with these rights.
Right to access and portability
:
You may request that we provide you a copy of your personal information held by us through your
Privacy Rights Dashboard
, or by submitting a request via our
Support Portal
.
Right to rectification
:
You may request us to rectify or update any of your personal information held by Coinbase that is incomplete or inaccurate by logging in to your account and clicking the Profile or My Account tab.
Right to deletion/erasure
:
You may request to erase your personal information, subject to applicable law. If you close your Coinbase Account, we will retain or delete information associated with your account as described in
Section 4. How Long We Keep Your Personal Information
.
Right to withdraw your consent
:
To the extent the processing of your personal information is based on your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time. The lawfulness of Coinbase’s processing before you withdraw your consent will not be affected by such withdrawal.
Right to object to or restrict processing
:
You may have the right to restrict or object to us using or transferring your personal information based on our legitimate interests, in the public interest, or for direct marketing. We may continue to process your personal information where permitted or required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving marketing communications from Coinbase through your account settings or by submitting a request via our
Support Portal
.
Right to non-discrimination
: We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights provided to you under law.
Right to lodge a complaint:
If you reside in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint about our practices with respect to your personal information with the supervisory authority of your country or state. In the UK, the relevant data protection authority is the Information Commissioner's Office, Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF, +44 (0303) 123 1113, email: casework@ico.org.uk. In Ireland, the relevant data protection authority is the Data Protection Commission, 21 Fitzwilliam Square South, Dublin 2, D02 RD28, +353 017650100 / + 353 1800437737, email: info@dataprotection.ie or by using the following online form:
Forms for Data Protection
.
If you reside in Australia or the Philippines, you may lodge a complaint about our practices with respect to your personal information with the supervisory authority of your country. In Australia, the relevant data protection authority is the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner, and complaints may be made through their website at
www.oaic.gov.au
. In the Philippines, the relevant data protection authority is the National Privacy Commission, email: complaints@privacy.gov.ph.
To protect your privacy and security, we may take steps to verify your identity before complying with your request and we may decline your request if we are unable to verify your identity.
Under certain US data privacy laws, as well as in Brazil, you may also designate an authorized agent to make these requests on your behalf.
These rights are not absolute, and may be denied: (a) when granting access or assisting portability would adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others; (b) to protect our rights and properties; (c) where the request is frivolous or vexatious; or (d) as otherwise permitted by law.
8. PRIVACY NOTICE FOR UNITED STATES RESIDENTS
If you are a
United States Resident
, you can learn more about how we use your information and your privacy rights by reviewing our
United States Privacy Notice
. Any terms defined in the California Consumer Privacy Act (as amended) (“
CCPA
”) have the same meaning when used in the US Privacy Notice.
9. HOW TO CONTACT US WITH QUESTIONS
If you have questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy, or if you have a complaint, please contact us on our
Support Portal
, at dpo@coinbase.com, or by writing to us at the address of your Coinbase service provider (provided in
Section 11. Our Relationship With You
below).
10. CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
We’re constantly trying to improve our Services, so we may need to change this Privacy Policy from time to time as well. We post any changes we make to our Privacy Policy on this page and, where appropriate, we will provide you with reasonable notice of any material changes before they take effect or as otherwise required by law. The date the Privacy Policy was last updated is identified at the top of this page.
We may provide additional "just-in-time" disclosures or information about how we collect or use your information in the context of specific Services; these in-product notices may supplement or clarify our privacy practices or may provide you with additional choices about how we use your information.
11. OUR RELATIONSHIP WITH YOU
If you reside in the EEA or Switzerland, Coinbase Ireland Limited, Coinbase Europe Limited and Coinbase Germany GmbH act as joint controllers in respect of your personal information. Coinbase Ireland Limited is the joint controller with primary responsibility for your personal information, including with respect to providing you with information and responding to any requests you may make under the GDPR. Please see more about how you can  exercise your rights under the GDPR through our
Privacy Rights Dashboard
.
CONSUMER/INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

NORTH AMERICA (UNITED STATES & CANADA)
Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
United States
Digital Asset Services, Fiat Wallet services
Coinbase, Inc. CA Entity No.: C3548456
Coinbase, Inc. c/o C T Corporation System 818 West Seventh St., Ste. 930 Los Angeles, California 90017
United States
Custodial Services
Coinbase Custody Trust Company, LLC (unless otherwise indicated in your service contract) NYS License # 122506
Coinbase Custody Trust Company, LLC c/o C T Corporation System 28 Liberty Street New York, New York 10005
United States
Credit and Lending Services
Coinbase Credit, Inc. CA Entity No.: C4315976
Coinbase Credit, Inc. c/o C T Corporation System 818 West Seventh St., Ste. 930 Los Angeles, California 90017
United States
Futures Trading
Coinbase Financial Markets, Inc. Entity No.: 4742037
100 Pine Street, Suite 1250, San Francisco, CA 94111
Canada
Digital Asset Services, Fiat Wallet services
Coinbase Canada, Inc.
2600-1066 West Hastings Street; Vancouver BC  V6E3X1
APAC
Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
Singapore
Digital Asset Services, Fiat Wallet Services
Coinbase Singapore Pte. Ltd. Unique Entity No.: 201935002N
One Marina Boulevard, #28-00, Singapore 018989
Australia
Digital Asset Services, Fiat Wallet Services
Coinbase Australia Pty Ltd; ACN 654 922 442
Coinbase Australia c/o TMF Corporate Services (Aust) Pty Limited, Suite 1 Level 11, 66 Goulburn Street, Sydney NSW 2000 Australia
Anywhere
Custodial Services
Coinbase Custody International Limited (unless otherwise indicated in your service contract) Company No: 657718
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay Dublin 2, Ireland
Anywhere but Singapore, and New Zealand
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Ascending Markets Kenya Limited
P.O. Box 10643, G.P.O. Nairobi, Kenya
New Zealand
Digital Asset Services, Fiat Wallet Services
Coinbase Europe Limited. Company No: 675475
CB Payments, Ltd Company No: 09708629 FCA Register No: 900635
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay Dublin 2, Ireland
The Scalpel, 18th Floor, 52 Lime Street, London, United Kingdom, EC3M 7AF
EEA (European Economic Area)
Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
EEA and the United Kingdom
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Europe Limited. Company No: 675475
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay Dublin 2, Ireland
Germany
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Germany GmbH. Company No: HRB 213709 B. BaFin-ID 10158674
Kurfürstendamm 22, 10719 Berlin, Germany
EEA
Fiat Wallet Services
Coinbase Ireland Limited. Company No: 630350 CBI Register No: C188493
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay Dublin 2, Ireland
United Kingdom (and select non-EEA countries in Europe)
Fiat Wallet Services
CB Payments, Ltd Company No: 09708629 FCA Register No: 900635
The Scalpel, 18th Floor, 52 Lime Street, London, United Kingdom, EC3M 7AF
EEA
Custodial Services
Coinbase Custody International Limited (unless otherwise indicated in your service contract) Company No: 657718
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay Dublin 2, Ireland
OUTSIDE EU, US, UK, APAC
Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
Anywhere but North America, APAC, EEA
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Ascending Markets Kenya Limited
P.O. Box 10643, G.P.O. Nairobi, Kenya
OTHER
Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
Anywhere but the USA
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Bermuda Limited
Park Place, 55 Par La Ville Road, Hamilton, HM11 Bermuda
Anywhere but US, UK, APAC, EEA
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Bermuda Services Limited
Park Place, 55 Par La Ville Road, Hamilton, HM11 Bermuda
Brazil
Digital Asset Services
Coinbase Brasil Ltda
City of Sao Paulo, State of Sao Paulo, at Alameda Santos, 2300, Suite 11 part, Cerqueira Cesar, ZIP Code 01418-200
DEVELOPER SERVICES

Where You Reside
Services Provided
Your Coinbase Service Provider
Contact Address
Anywhere
Coinbase Pay SDK, Exchange API , Rosetta, Prime API, Sign In with Coinbase
Coinbase, Inc. CA Entity No.: C4315976
Coinbase, Inc. c/o C T Corporation System 818 West Seventh St., Ste. 930 Los Angeles, California 90017
Anywhere
Wallet SDK and Commerce API
Toshi Holdings Pte. Ltd.
One Marina Boulevard, Postal 018989, Singapore
Anywhere but the United States
Delegate & Participate
Coinbase Cloud Pte. Ltd.
One Marina Boulevard, #28-00018989, Singapore
United States
Delegate & Participate
Coinbase Crypto Services, LLC
1209 Orange Street, Corporation Trust Center City of Wilmington, DE 19801